But the victim's brother says he can't think of anyone who would want to hurt him, saying, "Things were finally going well for him."
The San Francisco Police Department said the death was ruled a homicide and an investigation is ongoing.
The victim's brother, Louis Galicia, told ABC station KGO in San Francisco that Frank, previously a line cook in Boston, had landed his dream job as line chef at San Francisco's Sons & Daughters restaurant six months ago.
A spokesperson for Sons & Daughters said they were "shocked and devastated" by his death.
"We are a small team that operates like a close knit family and he will be dearly missed," the spokesperson said.
Louis Galicia said Frank initially stayed in hostels, but recently, "Things were finally going well for him."
"He found an apartment, he was dating a girl," Louis Galicia told KGO.
Louis Galicia said he could not think of anyone who would want to hurt his younger brother.
His way of connecting with the family was always making us a dish, making us dinner," Louis Galicia said.
He was the brother that went with the flow.
"With everything else that's going wrong with the world, he was that diamond in the rough that was shining bright every day," he said.
Anyone with information is asked to call the SFPD Tip Line at 415-575-4444.
Representatives of junior doctors have called on their union to authorise fresh industrial action in their dispute about a new contract.
The JDC says ministers have failed to address concerns about the contract.
Junior doctors and medical students voted in July to reject a contract deal agreed with the BMA.
In a letter to members released on Twitter on Thursday night, the JDC's chair Ellen McCourt said the government had remained "persistently silent" on issues which, she said, had resulted in the contract being rejected.
In response to the government's silence, JDC exec has today made a formal request for a special meeting of BMA Council to authorise a rolling programme of escalated industrial action beginning in early September.
The BMA's junior doctor leader, Dr Johann Malawana, resigned following the vote to reject the negotiated terms of the contract, which the BMA had recommended.
Russia and Turkey: An 'alliance of misfits'?
But, as Vladimir Putin greeted his Turkish counterpart in the gilded hall of a St. Petersburg palace, I got the distinct impression that Ankara wants this reconciliation the most.
But Mr Putin's smile looked thin and he was hardly oozing warmth even by his own restrained standards.
Recep Tayyip Erdogan by contrast talked repeatedly of his "dear friend" Mr Putin - five times, according to one report.
I lost count.
The next day one newspaper here described Mr Erdogan as acting as if nothing bad had ever happened.
To me, his enthusiasm implied the opposite.
But a lingering coolness emanating from Mr Putin showed that Russia's leader has forgotten nothing.
Moscow's reaction at the time was furious.
Mr Putin lashed out, accusing Ankara of stabbing Moscow in the back.
The offence was even greater, coming from a supposed friend.
For months, state-controlled media conducted a staggering, all-out offensive against Ankara.
All of a sudden, it seemed like Turks were to blame for everything.
But in St. Petersburg came the official message that it's time to move on.
Russia could claim a victory of sorts.
For Ankara the benefits of calling a truce are clear.
First and foremost, Erdogan needs all the friends he can get after he was nearly ousted from power last month in a failed coup.
Russian sanctions have hit hard - particularly the ban on charter flights, which usually carry several million Russian tourists to the Turkish coast each year.
They're banking on a late-season rush to the Mediterranean.
"Tourists that way, tomatoes back here," as a report in Vedemosti newspaper phrased it.
Ankara is angry with the West for what it considers a weak response to the attempted takeover.
Add to that its long-standing grudge at the snail's pace of talks to join the EU and step in Mr Putin - who is keen to capitalise on the chill and chip away at Turkey's ties with the West.
The Russian leader certainly won bonus points with Ankara for calling in support of the elected authorities after the attempted coup.
Mind you, that's a given for Moscow which has its own deep-seated fear of regime change.
So the summit at this glitzy, seaside palace allowed Russia and Turkey to present what one analyst described to me as an "alliance of misfits": two countries that feel rejected and mistreated by the West, joining forces.
The key one is Syria, where Moscow has recently been casting itself as peacemaker but where Russia and Turkey back opposite sides.
There is no clear consensus on where they can seek common ground on Syria.
But after months of open hostility - and given the potential for utter disaster when Nato member Turkey shot down that Russian fighter jet - it is surely better that the two leaders are at least talking again.
Royal Bank of Scotland to disappear for customers outside Scotland
The brand RBS is to be reduced to a back office role, according to the bank's chief executive.
Royal Bank of Scotland will disappear for customers outside Scotland.
Ross McEwan told BBC Scotland that the RBS brand was associated with the bank's global ambitions.
It has retreated from them since it nearly collapsed eight years ago and had to be bailed out.
It was backed with millions of pounds in sponsorship of international sport, from Six Nations rugby to Wimbledon champion Andy Murray.
But now, it has been judged right to let more national brands come to the fore.
Mr McEwan was interviewed during a tour of customers and staff in Inverness-shire.
He told BBC Scotland: "The RBS brand will end up becoming our investor brand and the one that our staff are employed with, because we are now becoming much more a bank of brands."
As the bank itself became a global brand, RBS became the global brand.
"The time is right for us to move to the bank of brands, because underneath (we've been asking) how do we focus on making this a better bank for customers?" said the chief executive.
It would have been very cynical three years ago if we'd said we're going to be a great bank for customers and put those brands out there.
We can bring those brands back up again, so I think the time is right.
Frankie Dettori reaches 3,000 winners with victory at Newmarket on Predilection
Dettori sprays champagne after a double at Newmarket takes him to 3,000 wins
Jockey Frankie Dettori secured his 3,000th British winner at Newmarket on Friday.
He brought up the landmark with his second winner of the night at his local track - on Predilection, trained by John Gosden.
The 45-year-old Italian is the sixth jockey to reach the landmark in Flat racing.
He follows Sir Gordon Richards, Doug Smith, Lester Piggott, Pat Eddery and Willie Carson.
Three-time champion jockey Dettori, who earlier won on Ghayyar, said: "It's special."
I'm relieved and very humble.
Dettori soaks up the cheers as he brings in Predilection after victory
Two jockeys have reached the milestone in jump racing - champion jockey Richard Johnson and retired 20-time champion Sir Anthony McCoy, who had more than 4,300 victories in a record-breaking career.
Frankie is one of the best jockeys of the modern era and it is no surprise he has reached this landmark so few have achieved before him.
He is stylish and strong, but it is his tactical nous that sets him apart from others in the weighing room.
He is a fantastic ambassador for racing, his enthusiasm and charisma have been drawing fans to the sport for years.
I said to Frankie a few weeks ago at Epsom he'd have ridden 6,000 winners if he wasn't just a weekend and big-race jockey!
Seriously though, Frankie's been riding winners in the UK for the best part of 30 years which is great to see.
He's a lively character which is good for British racing but more than that, he's an incredible jockey.
Frankie Dettori celebrated the milestone with a trademark flying dismount
From flying finishes to flying dismounts, Frankie Dettori has been the poster boy of British Flat racing for two decades.
It has been a rollercoaster ride.
Stacks of big-race winners, including his famous 1996 'Magnificent Seven' at Ascot, but he also survived a plane crash and served a drugs ban.
Three years ago he initially struggled when returning from that six-month suspension, but he showed formidable strength of character to defy the doubters and return to his best.
And he may not be done for some time - Dettori has previously said he would like to carry on competing until the age of 50, at least.
I think the administration's most important task is to support your activity as head of state in terms of drafting laws and control over how your instructions are implemented.
In a meeting with President Putin shown on state television both men claimed that the chief of staff was stepping down at his own request.
But despite the smiles for the cameras, few here are convinced - especially now, just before parliamentary elections.
So is this the fall-out from some kind of power struggle?
No-one knows yet.
But the official claim - that a man once touted as a potential president, suddenly wanted to run Russia's environmental policy - has been met with great scepticism.
Well, it turns out that I've been presidential chief of staff for four years and eight months.
In the late 1990s, when Mr Putin was head of the Federal Security Service (FSB), which replaced the KGB, Mr Ivanov was appointed as his deputy.
It was once thought that Mr Ivanov might become president of Russia after Mr Putin's second term, as a third term for Mr Putin would have been unconstitutional.
But that post was taken by another close Putin ally, Dmitry Medvedev.
Mr Putin became prime minister, before returning to the presidency just three-and-a-half years later.
Kevin Bain thinks the 75 fish could be sand eels deposited by a waterspout.
Queensferry Crossing: Bridge now connected to Fife
Engineers have joined the Queensferry Crossing's north deck and viaduct - meaning the bridge is now connected to Fife.
It is the first of four closures between the "deck fans," which are now nearing completion around each of the bridge's three towers.
Economy Secretary Keith Brown visited the site today and was among the first to walk from the land on to the bridge.
He said: "This is a historic and symbolic moment in the building of the Queensferry Crossing.
We're all witnessing engineering on a truly epic scale on this project, with over 30,000 tonnes of concrete and steel used just to build this part of the bridge.
Despite the massive size and weight of the bridge completing the closure between the viaduct and bridge deck is a delicate operation involving extremely precise tolerances for fit up.
Overall, nearly 79% of the total bridge deck is now in place, the final section of deck is having its concrete deck cast in Rosyth today, meaning all the deck is ready to be lifted into place on the bridge.
Michael Martin, Forth Crossing Bridge Constructors project director said: "The first closure on any bridge project is always a significant milestone.
After installing the last road deck section and connecting it to the expanding North Tower road deck, we then had to close the remaining gap on the north - or landward - side.
This was done by pulling the northern approach viaduct 700 millimetres southwards.
This was a massive and, at the same time, very delicate operation.
Massive because the viaduct is 222 metres long, weighs approximately 6,000 tonnes and had to be pulled up a gradient of about 3%.
Delicate because the tolerances the team were working to were tiny - just a few millimetres either way.
Forget the hype.
Simone Biles is immune to all of it.
Dynamic on vault.
Effortless on beam.
Jaw-dropping on floor.
Brilliant all over.
The 19-year-old American gymnast soared to the all-around title on Thursday, putting the gap between herself and the rest of the world on full display under the Olympic spotlight.
Her total of 62.198 was well clear of silver medalist and "Final Five" teammate Aly Raisman and Russian bronze medalist Aliya Mustafina.
United States' Simone Biles performs on the balance beam during the artistic gymnastics women's individual all-around final at the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, Thursday.
Biles became the fourth straight American woman to win the all-around title and fifth overall while cementing her reputation as the best of her generation and perhaps ever.
She burst into tears when her final total was posted and her long journey to this moment ended.
The achievement puts her in the same league as once-in-a-generation athletes like Michael Phelps who have taken their sports to new heights:
Biles has spent the last three years dominating her sport, winning 15 world championship medals - including 10 gold - with routines so astonishing in their mix of ambition and precision that 1984 Olympic champion Mary Lou Retton called her "the greatest gymnast I've ever seen."
One last test awaited in Brazil, a contest not so much between Biles and the rest of the field but between herself and the burden of oversized expectations.
Anything less than heading back to her family's home in Spring, Texas, with a fistful of golds would be seen as a disappointment.
United States' Simone Biles, left, and Aly Raisman embrace after winning gold and silver respectively for the artistic gymnastics women's individual all-around final at the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, Thursday, Aug.
Biles earned the first one on Tuesday while serving as the exclamation point to retiring national team coordinator Martha Karolyi's going away party.
While Biles insisted she's never looked ahead during her long run at the top, that's not exactly true.
A portion of her floor exercise routine - the one that includes her signature tumbling pass - is set to Latin music that would fit right at home in the street right outside the Rio Olympic Arena.
The girl adopted by her grandparents as a toddler and discovered by coach Aimee Boorman's mother during a field trip to the gym where Boorman was coaching has become a force.
She hasn't lost an all-around competition since the summer of 2013, a winning streak that should go for as long as Biles wants it to.
Though Mustafina took a small lead through two rotations, it was a mirage.
Balance beam and floor exercise - where Biles is the defending world champion - lay in wait.
She went back in front with a 15.433 on beam - and capped it with a 15.933 on floor.
Raisman hugged her gently as they awaited the final score - a mere formality - and tears appeared around Biles' glittery red, white and blue eyeliner when the vision she once wrote in a scrapbook became a reality.
Raisman's performance was a bit of revenge from four years ago, when she tied for third but lost the bronze to Mustafina on a tiebreaker.
This time, the 22-year-old team captain the Americans call "grandma" was well ahead.
She blew kisses to the crowd after her floor exercise, overcome by a comeback that at times seemed in doubt.
As for Biles, the 19-year-old's viral tweet from earlier this week now carries a whole new meaning:
Mahaj Brown, 6, "riddled with bullets," survives Philadelphia shooting
Police say a 6-year-old boy has been shot in Philadelphia, marking the second shooting of a 6-year-old in the city this week.
The grandparents say Brown suffered multiple gunshot wounds, including in his groin, leg, arm and abdomen, but was awake when he was transported to the hospital.
"He just took a lot, his little body was riddled with bullets," his grandmother Delores Melendez tells the station.
I just can't believe it.
The boy is listed in critical condition at a hospital and has undergone several surgeries.
He was set to start first grade at a local elementary school.
Brown was among four people shot in the Germantown section.
One of the 29-year-old men was reported in critical condition; the other two victims were listed in stable condition, according to CBS Philadelphia.
The child was found shot in the front seat of a car along with the 29-year-old in critical condition, the station reports.
The other two victims were not in the car and police are investigating whether any of the wounded men could be a shooter.
Investigators tells CBS Philadelphia it appears there was crossfire between multiple gunmen.
Assault weapon-style shell casings, traced to different assault style weapons, littered the scene.
It appears that this was definitely an ongoing battle.
That's what I call this year's Women's Olympic Gymnastics Team and for more reasons than one.
And second: This team features three gymnasts, Simone Biles, Gabby Douglas and Lauren "Laurie" Hernandez, who have been inspiring so many young girls of color.
The make-up of this team, rounded out by Aly Raisman, who is Jewish, and Madison Kocian, who is Catholic, is making everyone proud.
This team looks, finally, like America.
It also has solidified the black and Latina female presence at the top of this sport.
This is powerful.
Now the world has been able to witness the incredible performances of three-time World Champion Simone Biles, Douglas and Laurie Hernandez delivering the unexpected, yet masterful gymnastics routines.
We are witnessing the top of the sport, but it does not look like this at gymnastics classes across the country.
Simone, Gabby and Laurie all took the same path as Aly and Madison to make the Olympic team.
They are the "Final Five" because the next Olympic gymnastics team will only have four gymnasts on the team, and this is Marta Karolyi's last year coaching.
But the reality is that gymnastics is an expensive sport, and gymnasts primarily train in private gymnastics clubs that are maintained by parents paying the cost of the training, facility, travel, uniforms, competition fees, hotel fees (for the coaches and their gymnasts and families) and the list goes on.
These clubs are where the gymnasts get all of their training, and it's a costly and long-term commitment for the gymnasts' families.
Aimee Boorman, coach of Simone Biles, and Maggie Haney, coach of Laurie Hernandez, have both coached their athletes since they started in gymnastics.
In September, we will be expanding to Detroit (my hometown) to provide high quality gymnastics to the youth that deserve the opportunity to learn and benefit from this great Olympic sport.
It is the inspiration of this team that will send thousands of young girls to take gymnastics and that is great.
Thank you Simone, Aly, Laurie, Gabby and Madison for that serious showcase of "Girl Power" in winning the Olympic team gold and for motivating so many young girls of all backgrounds to begin their path to be healthy, strong and successful young women.
Junior doctors set to mount further strikes after rejecting Jeremy Hunt's proposal
In July, Mr Hunt revealed plans to impose the contract saying the NHS was in "no man's land" and any further delay would be damaging for staff and patients.
With just eight weeks before the first group of doctors are moved onto the new contract, progress needs to be made and time is running out.
Efforts by the BMA to resolve the dispute through talks have been met with an unwillingness to engage and, at times, deafening silence from the government.
This is despite a promise from Jeremy Hunt just last month that his door is always open.
"Jeremy Hunt needs to act now, lift the imposition and address junior doctors" concerns.
The last strike at the end of April saw the postponement of nearly 13,000 routine operations and 100,000 appointments as nurses and consultants were drafted in to provide cover for doctors on the picket line.
Thousands of heart attack patients are to benefit from a £2-a-day drug, after officials recommended it be given to more people for longer.
Anti-clotting drug ticagrelor slashes the risk of repeat attacks for people with heart disease.
The drug is already given for 12 months after a heart attack, reducing the risk of a stroke or another attack.
NHS watchdog NICE has advised that it should be given to people for four years, to further reduce the risk of cardiovascular problems.
But now NHS watchdog NICE has advised that it should be given to people for four years, to further reduce the risk of cardiovascular problems.
Heart attacks and strokes are caused by the build-up of fatty material in artery walls to form a plaque.
If the plaque breaks apart it can cause a blood clot, blocking blood to the heart causing a heart attack.
Ticagrelor, which is made by UK firm AstraZeneca and sold under the trade name Brilique, reduces this risk by making clots less likely.
The draft NICE guidance, published today, recommends that people be given 90 mg of ticagrelor for 12 months, followed by 60mg along with aspirin twice a day for another three years.
PC culture let vote fraud in Muslim areas flourish
Ex-Tower Hamlets mayor Lutfur Rahman was removed from office last year for corruption, prompting the government report
A culture of political correctness has led to a blind eye being turned to widespread voting fraud in Muslim communities, a devastating government report reveals today.
Ex-Cabinet minister Sir Eric Pickles lambasts the police, election watchdogs and town halls for ignoring evidence of electoral abuse because of "over-sensitivities about ethnicity and religion."
The former communities secretary, now the anti-corruption tsar, said the intimidation of voters on religious grounds was so bad that police should be allowed to put cordons outside polling stations to protect frightened voters.
Greater protection should be given to whistleblowers, Sir Eric says.
The report was ordered by Downing Street in the wake of the Tower Hamlets voting scandal in East London.
The court found Rahman "cynically perverted" the religious feeling of his Muslim community and silenced his critics with accusations of racism and Islamophobia.
Rahman, it was said, "ran his campaign on the basis that it was the religious duty of faithful Muslims to vote for him."
Up to 300 votes were dubious or the result of personation, where a person votes while posing as someone else.
His report says: "Evidence was presented of pressure being put on vulnerable members of some ethnic minority communities, particularly women and young people, to vote according to the will of the elders, especially in communities of Pakistani and Bangladeshi background.
"There were concerns that... state institutions had turned a blind eye to such behaviour because of "politically correct" over-sensitivities about ethnicity and religion."
The report, being considered by Theresa May, also calls for tougher checks on registration to prevent the electoral register being used for immigration and benefit fraud.
Consider the options for requiring voters to produce ID before voting.
Use indelible ink on a person's fingers once they cast their ballot to prevent anyone voting twice.
Ban political campaigners and activists from handling completed postal votes and postal vote envelopes.
Make it illegal to take pictures in polling stations.
Strengthen training to ensure staff enforce the rule that voters go to the booth alone.
Sir Eric savages the Metropolitan Police, saying it is "astonishing" that no criminal charges were brought after the Tower Hamlets case.
"The election court disqualified Lutfur Rahman and his agent for a litany of corrupt and illegal practices," he said.
He was found guilty beyond reasonable doubt - to a criminal standard of proof - on a series of grounds.
He also criticises the ineffectual "tick-box inspections" of town hall electoral registration departments.
Sir Eric said: "Last year's court ruling in Tower Hamlets was a wake-up call.
Our nation has a proud heritage as the mother of parliaments, yet the worrying and covert spread of electoral fraud and state of denial by some bodies threatens that good reputation.
Crazy for Kate's cyclist lookalike and other celeb doppelgangers of Rio Olympians
Fans of the Rio 2016 Olympics this week have gone wild for French cyclist Pauline Ferrand-Prevot, who has proven an impressive lookalike for the Duchess of Cambridge.
But the 24-year-old Olympian is far from the only athlete out fighting for gold this summer that boasts their own celebrity doppelganger - at least not according to social media.
So, in honor of the Rio Games and all the famous faces crossing our screens at the moment, FEMAIL have compiled a list of Olympians who bear more than a passing resemblance with Hollywood celebs.
The hunter and the wolf: U.S. Men's Archery Team member Brady Ellison, left, has been compared to Leonardo DiCaprio since he was a kid
Aside from Kate's doppelganger on the cycling track, many people online have been quick to point out how a certain archer could be the twin of A-lister Leonardo DiCaprio.
U.S. Men's Archery Team member Brady Ellison has caused a storm on Twitter after images of him looking eerily similar to the Wolf of Wall Street star surfaced.
And in fact, the archer became aware of the social media frenzy and admitted that he has been hearing that he looks like Leo since he was a kid.
'I personally don't see a huge resemblance, maybe besides the facial hair,' Brady told Huffington Post.
'He is a good-looking dude so I guess it's a compliment.'
One of the most popular comparisons from London 2012 is undoubtedly going to be pointed out even more this year: the striking likeness between British long jumper Greg Rutherford and popular actor Neil Patrick Harris.
Russian gymnast Aliya Mustafina, with her large, expressive eyes, has been said to be a dead ringer for Cuban-American singer Gloria Estefan.
And over in the pool, South African swimmer Cameron van der Burgh has been getting compared to Glee star Matthew Morrison for years now.
Changing it up: This user reckons that Nathan is an 'athletic version' of the Inception actor
Another long-running comparison has been between tennis star Rafael Nadal and actor Josh Hartnett who boast a similar heavy brow and lips.
Silver medal swimmer Russia's Yulia Efimova boasts more than just the same sunkissed skin and blonde hair as actress Annalynne McCord, while Team USA's Nathan Adrian has been said by fans to resemble an 'athletic version of Joseph Gorgon Levitt.'
Tough women: Soccer star Hope Solo, left, and Dexter actress Jennifer Carpenter, right, have similar face shapes and eyes
Floating a theory: According to this user, perhaps there is a reason behind the pair's similar looks
One Twitter user took to the site recently to declare her happiness that 'the rest of the internet thinks that Hope Solo and Jennifer Carpenter are actually identical.'
Other popular comparisons have included Kerri Walsh-Jennings and her smile that is near-identical to that of actress Laura Linney, as well as gold medal-winning gymnast Gabby Douglas, who boasts her own beautifully broad smile that matches that of Bring It On star Gabrielle Union.
CBC Olympics commentator apologizes for saying Chinese swimmer 'died like a pig'
Byron MacDonald's analysis of 14-year-old Ai Yanhan's fourth place finish at the women's 4x200m freestyle relay outraged viewers of CBC's live Olympic coverage on Wednesday
Canadian broadcaster CBC has been forced to apologize after one of its commentators said a 14-year-old female Chinese swimmer 'went out like stink' and 'died like a pig' during a race.
Commentator Byron MacDonald thought his mic was turned off when he started to dispense some of his own opinions at the end of the women's 4x200m freestyle relay final.
MacDonald, who was brought on board CBC's commentary team to provide 'color' could be heard saying: 'That little 14-year-old from China dropped the ball, baby'.
Too excited, went out like stink, died like a pig.
Chinese swimmer Ai Yanhan, 14, swam the second leg of the relay in 1:57.79 - 1.61 seconds slower than Canada's Taylor Ruck, allowing the Canadians to close the gap on China.
Viewers across Canada were quick to react online after being shocked by the tone and the language used
Emmett Macfarlane tweeted, "Did the CBC announcer just say the 14-year-old swimmer from China 'died like a pig'"????
The idiot didn't realize they were still on the air.'
Ai Yanhan of China in the Women's 4 x 200m Freestyle Relay Final was described as: 'That little 14-year-old from China dropped the ball, baby.'
Criticism on Twitter came thick and fast against Byron MacDonald with many calling him out
Twitter users did not hold back when the heard how insensitive Byron Macdonlad was being
You represent the CBC and Canada and make us all sound like a bunch of racists. #disgusted.
Soon after, Scott Russel who was hosting CBC's broadcast apologized on-air for MacDonald's comment, saying: 'We apologize the comment on a swim performance made it to air.'
It was an unfortunate choice of words, we're sorry it happened.'
CBC ended up apologizing more than 90 times to people who had tweeted in response to the remark
Fellow commentator, Scott Russel, had to make an apology on MacDonald's behalf
CBC then copied and pasted their apology to more than 90 other twitter users who complained about MacDonald's comments
The network was also quick to apologize and released a statement.
We sincerely regret that these statements were made, and that they were allowed to go to air.
To be clear, Byron's comments were related to the swimmer's performance, not to her as an individual.
That said, they were inappropriate and an unfortunate choice of words and Byron is very sorry for what he said.
On Thursday afternoon, MacDonald apologized on-air and attempted to qualify his remark by stating he didn't mean for it to be construed as a personal attack.
'I would like to take a moment to apologize for a comment that I made last night after the women's relay,' he said on CBC's Olympic broadcast.'
'I was referring to a swimmer's performance, and not to them as a person.'
'Needless to say, there was no disrespect intended and I'm very sorry.'
Primark shopper outraged at woman who brazenly tried on underwear in the middle of the shop
Shoppers didn't know where to look when a woman stripped off to try on knickers on the shop floor in the middle of a Primark.
To make it even worse, she sized up how she looked in them, peeled them off and put them back on the shelf.
The Primark store in Bouverie Place shopping centre, Folkestone, where the woman tried on knickers before putting them back on the shelf
A mother-of-two, Jenny Davidson, who was in the shop at the time, said after trying on the underwear the mystery woman 'got dressed again and walked out of the store without buying anything.'
Standing in the middle of the shop floor, she took a pair of knickers from the display, stripped off her own tights and pants and put them on.
'She didn't try to find anywhere discreet to do it - she just stood there, bold as brass.'
'Everyone was staring as she took the knickers off again and obviously didn't like them because she put them back on the shelf.'
She did the same with three more pairs before finally deciding there was nothing she liked and she got dressed again and walked out.
'She didn't seem to care who was watching - or think about the person who would eventually buy the knickers she'd been trying on.'
Ms Davidson, 33, who lives in the Kent town, said: 'How disgusting to think someone is going to take home knickers that another person has been wearing and they haven't been cleaned.'
Ms Davidson added: 'I gather the staff apparently tried to remove the garments from sale after she had left - which is just as well.'
'I'd hate to get home with a new pair of knickers and find another woman had put them on and taken them off again, and they hadn't been washed.'
How to defend yourself from gun attacks using Krav Maga
We spoke to Rhon Mizrachi, New York-based grandmaster of the Krav Maga Federation, to find out how to deal with gun-toting muggers at close range.
Whether you're approached from in front or behind, this video will show you how to turn the tables on your mugger.
If approached from behind, Mizrachi says, the first thing to do is turn around, so that you can see your attacker and 'clear the line of fire'.
You then grasp the gun between your forearm and shoulder before hitting them in the face with your free elbow.
A knee to the groin follows, and while the attacker doubles up in pain, you twist the gun from his hands, smack him in the face with the barrel and back up, keeping the weapon trained on him.
For gunmen approaching from the front, it's a similar technique - get your body out of the line of fire, grab the gun and twist it around so the villain can't fire.
At the same time, put weight on the gun and punch the attacker in the chest, then twist the gun from his grip before backing up and pointing it at him.
Sounds tricky?
Check the video to see exactly how Mizrachi does it.
But remember that the safest way out of any mugging - if you're not a Krav Maga grandmaster - is to hand over your cash.
A family of yobs left their council house with £50,000 worth of damage after they were evicted for terrorising their neighbours.
Tanya Skeldon and her partner Shaun Trebilcock have been kicked out of the property in Saltash, Cornwall, after a long list of complaints against them.
After they were forcibly removed from the property, shocked housing associations officers found the property in a state of disrepair.
The walls were left with gaping holes, floorboards were ripped up, rubbish was strewn over the floor and graffiti was daubed on the walls.
She said: 'It's been an absolute nightmare for people down here and I don't think people should have to live like that.
This family are notorious and their name is notorious.
The couple had three sons who lived at the property intermittently and police say the reign of terror the family inflicted included fighting in the street with baseball bats, intimidating nearby residents, drug use, drug dealing and excessive shouting, arguing and swearing.
Skeldon, 47, whose name was on the tenancy, was given an antisocial behaviour order in June.
Old rubbish was found in a number of the rooms of the house, which may be demolished
Floor boards had been pulled up in the property, from which drugs had been dealt in the past
Neighbours say they were seen fighting in the street and police were regularly called
Cornwall Housing evicted her and her partner forcefully from the property this week after giving them an extended period of 11 weeks to move on voluntarily.
The eviction was hailed by relieved neighbours who said their lives had been made a living hell.
One said: 'They didn't care about anybody.'
We lived next to them for 20 years and it's always been bad.
The amount of times we've seen the police down here is unbelievable.
We got up because it was so quiet here - we're not used to that!
It's going to be lovely now that they're finally gone.
Adam Fitzpatrick, Cornwall Housing's neighbourhood enforcement manager, said the family failed to cooperate with the local authority.
The family have lived in the house for 20 years, with police regularly called to the property
Rubbish and old toys have been thrown down the overgrown side of the council house
He added: 'It is a shame that the tenant failed to accept any responsibility for the behaviour of her and her family as eviction is always the last course of action that Cornwall Housing considers.
This was a very difficult case as the behaviour was extreme and their actions must have been terrifying for her neighbours to witness.
Mr Fitzpatrick said that the three sons had all lived at the property at different times but said they were all in their 20s.
In 2014, police raided the property and found more than 70g in cannabis as well as scales, paraphernalia and £1,700 in cash.
Skeldon was fined after pleading guilty to possession of a Class B drug with intent to supply.
After being made homeless, it is understood that Tanya and her partner are now living in private housing in Plymouth.
The walls of many of the house's rooms had graffiti scrawled across them.
Angela Crow, of Devon and Cornwall Police, said the eviction sent a clear warning to other tenants who continue to flout the rules.
'This sends out to those who feel that they can behave without recrimination, as well as those blighted by such behaviour,' she said.
Reid says Clinton will stick with Garland as Supreme Court nominee if elected
Senate Republicans have blocked Garland's confirmation since President Barack Obama nominated him in March.
Reid said on a conference call Thursday that he is predicting Clinton will pick Garland "with some degree of credibility."
He praised Garland and said Clinton's team would not want to "rock the boat" with a new pick.
Reid said Republicans who are blocking Garland's nomination are "minions" and "enablers" of Republican presidential candidate Donald Trump.
He said Trump is unfit for office.
Treats says nude calendar for 'women, as well as men'
Treats magazine is partnering with photographer David Bellemere to launch a 1970s' Pirelli-inspired calendar for 2017.
But instead of famous naked people, they're setting out to find the next generation of top models for their 2017 NU Muses calendar.
Treats president Steve Shaw told us earlier this year that his nude-heavy magazine differs from old-school Playboys because "Playboy is for men."
Apparently he thinks the calendar is, too.
"We need to get back to showcasing timeless and classic nudity where women, as well as men, feel comfortable and inspired by these images of the female body," Shaw said in a press release announcing the calendar.
Models can submit pics online or in person at open casting calls in Los Angeles and New York.
Greenland shark is longest-living vertebrate animal - video report
Julius Nielsen, who has been studying the sharks, says record goes to a female thought to be between 272 and 512 years old and is five metres in length
A French court has rejected a bid by Calais authorities to demolish dozens of makeshift shops and restaurants in the Jungle camp where thousands of refugees are living.
A Lille court ruled there was no legal basis for expelling the people running the 72 makeshift shops, but said the Calais prefect's concerns "were totally understandable."
The judge, Jean-François Molla, said the groceries, cafes and restaurants played a much bigger role than simply feeding people that "live in extremely precarious conditions."
One of the places that had been under threat from demolition was the camp's Jungle Book Kids" Cafe which is run not-for-profit and provides 200 meals a day, English and French classes, and asylum advice for the hundreds of vulnerable unaccompanied minors in the camp.
More than 170,000 people have signed a petition to protect the kids" cafe.
A letter sent to the Guardian said its closure "would be a catastrophe for these children, some of whom are as young as eight."
Two charities, Help Refugees and L'Auberge des Migrants, on Friday estimated that numbers in the Jungle camp have risen to over 9,000 people - the highest ever - after a steep increase in arrivals during the summer.
This year, Huayuan County integrated more than RMB 18.5 million of educational funds and self-raised more than RMB 2.5 million, which will be injected into the real-name bank accounts of the corresponding students.
"I thought my elder brother and I cannot afford the college study after my father passed away. It never occurred to me before the county government helped us so timely." She said gratefully.
As of August 8, Huayuan County had raised more than 21 million yuan of various relief funds this first half year for 13,140 poverty-stricken students.
All poverty-stricken students of the county that should be supported have been supported financially.
According to the reporter on the scene, a large container truck shifted to the fast lane with the command of a traffic policeman. Its container box fell down onto the green road, making a 2 cm deep pit on the road.
A responsible person of the relevant department said that the transition from the "temporary residence permit" to "residence permit" means that Beijing will shift its administration for non-permanent residents from the "management" to multi-directional services.
It is understood that in July 2014, SAT took the first step in the central government departments to issue an Information Disclosure Methods For Major Tax Violations along with the Tax Credit Management Approach.
In addition to the illegal facts, legal basis, the handling and punishment of these cases, the basic information of the illegal parties and the relevant intermediaries will be included in the "blacklist" exposure.
"The credit repair mechanism is an important milestone in the construction of the tax credit system and even the credit system of the whole society, which indicates that the construction of our social credit system is becoming more and more mature."
Therefore, the problem of high pollution, heavy energy consumption and land occupation has not been fundamentally addressed in the transformation of production and life styles.
On the one hand, Jiangsu tops in the whole country from the perspective of the establishment achievement of ecological environment of all levels and classes. But on the other hand, the resource and environment pressure is heavy.
To solidly promote the ecological environment protection and governance, we need to fundamentally promote the transformation of production and lifestyle and promote the transformation of people's livelihood from the perspective of ecological civilization construction.
The third party company (non-Chinese company) commissioned by the Olympic Organizing Committee is located in the Sao Paulo state, Brazil, about 75 kilometers away from the city of Sao Paulo.
It is reported that the flags are expected to arrive in Rio on the 11th. Then the Olympic Organizing Committee will send the flags to various Olympic venues after receiving the flag. The whole process will be under the supervision of the Chinese embassy in Brazil.
On the 11th day of the month, many companies came to the Qingdao Municipal Emissions Trading Center to submit emissions subscription. After acceptance, they shall pay fees.
In the morning of 11th day of the month, Zhao Xiuping, the General Manager of Qingdao Shuangtao Fine Chemical (Group) Co., Ltd. came to the trading center to submit emissions subscription.
After Zhao Xiuping submitted the application form and the construction project environmental impact report, etc., Qingdao Municipal Emissions Reserve and Trading Service Center began to review the application materials.
According to the collection standard determined by Qingdao price bureau and financial sector, the estimated initial emission fee is about 641,200 yuan. The working staff will finish review within 7 working days.
On the same day, Qingdao SF-XC-ZZ Coach Component Co., Ltd. also came to purchase emission rights for its project with an annual output of 4,200 interior accessories of high-speed rail and CRH.
The paid use and trading of Air Pollutant Emission Permits cover the city's key industrial enterprises for the production and supply of electricity and heat.
On January 1, 2016, the current pollutant discharging unit which obtained environmental impact assessment shall be exempt from expenditure of compensated use.
Han Hongyan, deputy director of Qingdao Environmental Protection Bureau, introduces that companies of illegal and excessive sewage must be punished in accordance with the relevant laws and regulations. Illegal enterprises cannot be allowed to circumvent punishment via purchasing emission rights.
Now for their own interests, enterprises have raised their enthusiasm of pollution control, cherished limited emissions and reduced emissions of pollutants.
With the economic interests drive, to reduce pollutants' discharge has shifted from the government's mandatory behavior into a conscious market behavior, so as to truly protect the environment, nature and public health.
Emission right, also known as "dumping right", means the right to discharge pollutants. It refers to the right for emitters to discharge pollutants to the environment in line with the law within the quota assigned by the government.
This right is essentially the right of the emitters to occupy, use and benefit from environmental capacity resources.
Next, under the premise that the total discharge of pollutants does not exceed the total allowable emission volume, the internal resources of pollution began to swap discharge capacities via currency exchange.
Although Russia and the West did not reach an agreement on the cooperation against the extremist forces of Syria, Russia would strengthen cooperation with Syria, Iran and Iraq in this regard.
On March 15 this year, Russia's major military forces began to evacuate, but the Russian side promised to continue to retain the military base in Heimi Mimi and the naval base in Tartus.
In the case of renovating old houses and successful startup in his hometown, He Peijun is making a good example: to inherit a 100-year old house and tell a story about the land heritage.
Today, 100,000 people on average visit Zhushan each year, bringing a variety of ideas or seeking inner peace.
In fact, the relationship between the village and the city should companionship with, just like mother and child. No matter strong or weak. There is no need for any party to be governed by the other party. Such a relationship is warm.
There is no fixed pattern of rural development, but it is quite difficult to just rely on spontaneous rural changes. One of the most important changes is to let the right people go to villages.
Unfortunately, due to some reasons such as the large number of illegal cases and difficulty in obtaining evidences, those people have never been punished and make the laws become a kind of decoration.
If the traffic control department can be determined to declare war to the mobile phone playing behavior while driving and normalize such measures, such illegal behaviors will surely be curbed.
The policy measures that are inconsistent with the idea of this implementation will receive a centralized cleanup. They should be corrected and abolished if necessary.
In the collective greenhouse of Donglin village of Taicang City, the 48-year-old Wang Xuefen is leading workers to pear spray pesticides on pear trees.
There are 150 acres of orchards and more than 10 species, but only 12 workers plus a technical engineer are ok.
Last year, the income was a total of RMB 50,000. I cannot earn so many if i work in the factory because of such age.
Last year, the income of Donglin village reached RMB 22 million, of which total agricultural income accounted for nearly a half.
According to Su Qifang, the village secretary, per capita land cultivation area increases each year. 50 mu (a unit of area, one "mu"=0.0667 hectares) in the beginning and over 100 mu now. The revenue per mu increases every year and the income of professional farmers also have room for growth every year.
With shares quantifying to each villager, the highlight of the rural collective economic reform is to be clear about the property rights of rural collective management and exploring political and economic separation.
With two accounts for two institutions, this can prevent the village cadres from participating in collective asset management corruption.
According to Zhu Baoping, they should further move forward the reform, engage in community shares cooperation, quantify the assets to members, fix it to farmers and produce clear property rights.
PEAK will always be oriented to promoting consumer demand, building sports industry ecosphere and accelerating the strategic upgrading of single sporting goods manufacturing enterprise to professional sports service enterprises.
As some of the tenants were still missing, he also called on residents of the fireplaces to contact the authorities.
It is reported that, Ms. Du Lei (Mariana Turay) who has been living in this apartment for 30 years, said: "It seems like a bomb falling down."
On August 11, the first Jinzhou Wetland Tourism Festival kicked off at Jinzhou Qriental Huadicheng "Crane Lake".
Xiamen girl Zhang Binbin: "handsome hands" encourage her to start shooting career, which saw several "reverse"
The ordinary farmer has a daughter, named Zhang Binbin. She is the one to win sanzi final silver medal of Olympic Games Women's 50-meters rifle games for China in the evening of the eleventh.
In the evening of the 11th day of the month, just in front of this new TV set, the Zhang Donghong couple and their dozens of relatives and friends have witnessed the magic process for the couple's daughter to catch up and reverse from almost being eliminated in the preliminaries to almost winning.
At the game, Zhang Binbin was ranked in the middle and lower reaches and it seemed she was still quite far away from the final.
But her parents and friends did not give up, kept watching the live and saw other players finish the game. Zhang Binbin raised her ranks all the way and finally came to the final. At this time, a burst of cheers broke out in her home.
In the final, Zhang Binbin also started from lagging behind and shot more stably and won the silver medal with just 0.2 rings behind the champion.
This year, the 27-year-old Zhang Binbin, in the 16-year shooting career, has actually missed the silver medal for several times.
According to her mother Zhang Xiaolong, her daughter sent a few "little persuaders" from her village at their hesitation.
These little persuaders are girls and boys of her village who were recommended to attend the training at the same time, including Zhang Binbin's cousin.
But after the repeated efforts of her enlightening teacher, Zhang Binbin returned to Xiamen team.
And after she came into the provincial team, Zhang Binbin returned home because she found it almost hopeless to enter the national team after a long time.
Just at yesterday's game, the Xiamen girl achieved several reversals of the shooting with her insistence.
"Each coach has his own method to choose the potential player. I decided to take her once I saw her beautiful hands."
Zhang Donghong also recalled, in the training test, although the results of her daughter were not the best, her rings were very stable, which is also an important reason for Zhang Binbin to attract coaches.
During the training process of Zhang Binbin, it was the input of this farmer girl that impressed Zhang Yajie most.
He recalled that after Zhang Binbin came into the Xiamen shooting team more than a year later, the team carried out a long shot of gun training, requiring players not to move for half an hour.
Zhang Xiaolong told reporters that her daughter has always been a quiet and well-behaved child, with the hobby of painting and producing toys.
"I used to make clothes and do some sowing jobs. Binbin picked up some scraps to make her own dolls."
She said, her daughter often sewed hand toys. Plus, she is good at painting and could make animated toys from the doll's facial features to clothing.
As an athlete, Zhang Binbin and her family are separate more than being together. As she can only return home during festivities, she mainly contacts family members by phone in other time.
According to her parents, no matter meeting in person or talking by phone, Zhang Binbin seldom talked about her hard work but more about some happy things.
Zhang Xiaolong showed the animation show of her daughter to the reporter, "She should keep drawing instead if she did not become shooter."
In the living room on the second floor of Zhang Binbin, there was a cupboard filled with medals and certificates.
Zhang Donghong put away the medals neatly and placed all certificates into files for storage. "This is honor made by Binbin after a dozen of years' efforts. We feel quite cherished."
Recently, Hebei Cixiao Fund sent a 16,000-yuan relief sent to six families who lost their relatives in Xiaozuo, Taitou and Guiquan Village of Jinjing County.
This is another condolence and care activity after the fund association releases the call for finding "bereaved children and lonely old men causued by the flood disaster in July 19, 2016".
The 719 heavy rainfall caused heavy disaster to many cities of Hebei Province and resulted in the flood disaster of some regions in Hebei province. During the period, some people were dead and missing.
The good man "Lao Tie" sacrificed his life when he helped the community on drainage, leaving a 2-year-old kid and a wife with child. The moving story of the good man "Lao Tie" made the entire provincial capital moved.
On August 4, the working personnel of Hebei Provincial Cixiao Fund and volunteers of Hebei Brand Association came to his home and offered his relatives with 3,200-yuan love donation.
According to a Hong Kong Oriental Daily report made on August 12, the current diamond sales in Mainland China were accused of three major problems, including the false marking of diamond clarity to raise sales price, false diamond weight and unguaranteed aftersales, etc.
Antwerp is one of the world's largest diamond trading centers. The diamond cutting technology of local artisans is well-known. All diamonds on sale have undergone rigorous identification, deeply welcomed by the mainland ladies.
"A small cloth bag, holding in one's hand, such light-weighted, is worth of almost one million yuan", a woman surnamed Liu who participated in the purchase of diamonds told of her experience in Antwerp last June to the mainland media.
She buried the diamond in her lingerie and carried it all day along, including when she went to toilet and took bath.
Recently, she sold the diamond with 120% more than the price she bought and earned two hundred thousand yuan.
According to the provisions of the Mainland Customs, diamonds are neither supplies nor necessities during the trip and thus belong to the scope of goods. So such diamond should be declared at entry and exit. Otherwise, it shall be classified as smuggling. People may be sentenced to jail.
According to foreign media reports, on the 10th day of the month of the local time, the British Prime Minister's Downing Street announced that British Prime Minister Teresa Mei will go to Switzerland to spend the summer vacation, but did not disclose the specific place.
The British "Guardian" commented that the symbolic neutrality nature of the Swiss played a role in the choice of the British Prime Minister's first resort.
British "Daily Telegraph" commented that Teresa Mei chose to take a vacation in Switzerland. This is the first time that the British Prime Minister chose to go vacation in Swiss after Margaret Thatcher.
The choice of these two female prime ministers is quite a contrast to the hot place which Blair and Cameron, the two male prime ministers like to go to.
On June 23, the British held a referendum for Brexit, but the British new prime minister did not want to start the article 50, which is involved with the Lisbon Treaty before the end of the year.
As the inheritance of intangible cultural heritage projects of Anhui province mainly relies on oral and face-to-face passage, many intangible cultural heritage projects are on the verge of failing to be handed down from past generations. So the application of digital technology for conservation is imperative.
According to the work plan of the Standing Committee of the Provincial People's Congress this year, the Standing Committee plans to listen to the deliberation of special work report, and carry out the implementation of banking supervision and management law and special inquiry of serving local economic development.
In mid-August, the Standing Committee will organize two research groups to conduct research in some cities to prepare for the special inquiry.
Hua Jianhui pointed out that this was the first time that the Standing Committee of the Provincial People's Congress listened to and deliberated on the special work report of vertical administration department and carry out special inquiries. It is the active exploration for enhancing and exploring the supervision work of the Provincial People's Congress.
In the director department of Kashi, Xinjiang, with the order of the director, the armed police in three regions, namely Kashi, Hotan and Aksu, followed the order quickly, implemented motor-driven and left for the exercise combat zone.
China's Mars program is coming
China Mars exploration mission aims to achieve surrounding, landing and patrolling at one time, which has never occurred in foreign countries.
China's Mars exploration launch target is to step around, land and patrol at one time. Such task has considerable difficulty.
Because the Mars probe can encounter a time window in 26 months, experts are closely working on the project plan and try to launch the first Mars probe in 2020.
"Every two or three years, there is a chance that Mars is closest to Earth. And at this point, it is most energy efficient to launch the vehicle."
Mars exploration involves a lot of technical areas. In particular, although the rover is a space detector, it has a distinctive feature compared with the general space detector.
In other words, the Mars probe should be capable of determining the driving route and equipped with the ability to find obstacles.
A large number of signs also show that the Mars is likely to be the same as the current Earth, only after billions of years of evolution into the atmosphere thin, low temperature, water depletion and so on.
Therefore, the detection or manned landing on the Mars for research can help propose a pre-arranged planning to prevent the earth from becoming the second Mars which is difficult for human beings to inhabit.
"Mangalian" is used to study the surface, the atmosphere and mineral characteristics of the Mars and explore whether there are signs of methane and life on the Mars.
The hardest part of the mission is that the probe just has one chance before entering the Martian atmosphere for aerodynamic shape and parachute deceleration.
A dust storm similar to the Earth's dust is often formed in the Mars in the summer, which will lead to a sharp decline in solar energy. So a "sleep" mode must be designed for the Mars rover and let it wait patiently until the disappearance of dust storms.
At the same time, the Martian atmosphere has a reducing effect on sunlight, which poses a problem for the energy supply for Mars detection.
This requires that the detector's sun wing area to be larger, and need to constantly adjust, and strive to align with the sun direction.
"The core and the most difficult part of the Mars exploration mission are the aerodynamic shape and parachute deceleration process after the probe enters Martian atmosphere. There is just one chance to ensure success."
Because there is not so much propellant to offset the high speed, the slowdown should rely on the atmosphere of the Mars while landing the Mars. However, it is quite difficult to simulate the atmosphere of the Mars on earth.
According to Taiwanese media reports, Lin Quan, the head of Taiwan's Executive Yuan, announced yesterday morning, "Ill-gotten Party Assets Handling Regulations by political parties and their accompanying organizations" will take effective since today.
KMT Vice Chairman Zhan Qixian said, "Kuomintang, with a hundred years of history, will step down otherwise without social commitment and responsibility."
Lin Quan stressed that if the political party, accompanying organization or trustees are in violations of the regulations which prohibit provisions ban, the Commission will investigate and punish "according to the law".
Lin Quan also announced that Hong Peigen, "Deputy Director of the Independent", will serve as the vice chairman of the Ill-gotten Party Assets Settlement Committee.
He said that Gu Lixiong will be the most appropriate candidate for the Ill-gotten Party Assets Handling Regulations. The experience of Hong Peigen who dealt with the major cases will serve as the foundation for the committee to uncover the related Ill-gotten Party Assets.
Zhan Qixian said that, as long as there are party assets today, no one will give you social donations. So if the party were all confiscated away, then Kuomintang can just ask for social support and sponsorship, "You will have chance to go when there are no assets."
Zhan Qixian also stressed that even if the Ill-gotten Party Assets Handling Regulations goes into effect and the Kuomintang party assets are not fully confiscated, the rest will continue to be confiscated as promised, the party asset will go null and the party will start from scratch.
Original title: Suit launched by "corridor doctor" Lan Yuefeng against CCTV host Wang Zhi'an for reputation infringement fails in instance judgment
At the beginning of 2014, CCTV reporter Wang Zhi'an found after his survey that although Lan Yuefeng was sitting in the corridor for more than 600 days and was shaped as the tragic hero suppressed by the media, these reports had a lot of false information.
On March 29, 2014, the "corridor doctor" program produced by CCTV news survey broadcasted.
All information about the so-called over-medical treatment reported by Lan Yuefeng to the media do not have any evidence support.
In the microblogging with real-name certification, Wang Zhi'an also said that the reason for Lan Yuefeng to become this is because of his stubborn characters and paranoid personality".
Lan Yuefeng claimed that Wang Zhi'an should delete the microblogging and apologized to him and made compensation of 100,000 yuan for the mental damage solatium.
Highlight of the 12th day of the month: at the beginning of Track and Field Events, the Chinese team is quite busy and the women's football association aims to become the top four of the bicycle games
The bicycle game is expected to realize the "zero breakthrough" in the Olympic gold medal while the Women's World Cup girls will challenge Germany team, the world champion winner for twice and are expected to become the top four.
Wang Zhen was quite outstanding in the two races. He won silver medal for the athletics world championship held in Beijing last year and was upgraded to the individual project champion in the world championship this May.
Zhang Huizhen is considered as a late bloomer. She regrets about not winning the last session of the London Olympic Games tickets before, but now she proudly stands on the top of the Rio Olympic podium.
Zhang Huizhen won the gold medal in Lisa Wenglu, a total score of 6-2 in the women's archery finals at the Samba Boulevard in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.
She did archery for the first time in the fourth grade of primary school. She won the first individual tournament gold medal when she was 27 in 2014. So she is a late bloomer.
Zhang Huizhen recalled, "My performance before high school was too bad to enable me to participate in the national competition.
Zhang Huizhen was ranked the fourth at the London Olympic Games qualification trials. Unfortunately, she lost the Olympic admission and can just watch her colleague and good friend Qi Pubei score two gold medals.
Zhang Huizhen talked about his gold winning after the women's individual awards ceremony of archery. "I tried to shoot one by one until the last. Maybe it is because this brings me good results and makes me contented."
The 28-year-old Korean archery "No.1", and the London Olympic Games archery individual tournament winner Qi Fubei won the bronze medal.
Qi Fubei was defeated by Zhang Huizhen in the semifinals and competed for the bronze medal with the Mexican player Alexandra Valencia.
Qi Fubei shed tears after she knew she won the blonde medal. At this time, we can know her pressure.
Firstly, the coaching staff accumulated rich experience in his gradual study. Secondly, it needs scientific training, which should be accumulated over time.
The Archery team helped the team players focus and remain unbiased via military training and going through the cemetery during night.
The new generation of iPhone is really "eye-catching", hot and hard-to-get. If you want to buy the genuine product at the first time, you must choose a good channel, for example, Suning.
This has exacerbated people's disappointment of the new iPhone, "It is lengthened, but cannot be used to cast holographic images! This generation of iPhone is so terrible."
Another evidence to support this news is that as early as 2014, Apple will allow headset manufacturers to produce headset products via producing charging interface.
Another evidence to confirm this message is that Apple allows the headphone manufacturer to produce headphone via the connection of charge interface.
It is understood that currently 20% of user groups of iPhone6 or 6Plus have such a plan to purchase iPhone7. This is a quite high proportion.
Secondly, according to expert analysis, most of the iPhone fans like to replace their own iPhone mobile phone.
Supply and demand contradiction will affect the average user, so it is time to choose a good channel and purchase the genuine iPhone7 for the first time.
According to informed sources, recently, Suning executives and Apple frequently meet, with the purpose to prepare adequate supply.
Operators have negotiated with Suning. So it is foreseeable that, with the depth of cooperation between the two sides, lower prices and more intimate services will inevitably bring to users.
"With the lowest price, the consumer may "buy iPhone7 with just 7 yuan per day".
Adequate supply and a variety of concessions will alleviate the pressure of iPhone7 buying. Suning's logistics will change such good feeling into more intuitive sense of experience.
Maybe you'll get a call at midnight. "Hello, Suning Tesco, your iPhone7 is here."
As part of the European tour, Barcelona's "Ming Dynasty Heritage Exhibition" will continue until early October.
Yesterday, Huaxia Bank and Shanghai Pudong Development Bank issued a semi-annual report of the year 2016. In the second quarter, China Securities Finance Corporation Limited (CSFC) will once again buy their shares.
Among them, CSFC will hold an additional 29.2931 million shares of Huaxia Bank. By the end of June, CSFC will increase its shares of Huaxia Bank to 387 million shares, raising its shares of Huaxia Bank from 3.35% to 3.62%.
According to the estimates of China Merchants Securities, deducted from the shares, CSFC will hold another 38 million shares of Pudong Development Bank in the second quarter and raise its shares to almost 600 million shares, which account for 2.77% of the bank shares.
Composed of more than 100 circular small ponds, the park is planted with more than 300 varieties of ornamental lotus, water lilies and so on.
Rural lotus industry is both ornamental and amusing, with economic benefits and has become the highlights for the development of new villages.
According to foreign media reports, the "green pool" incident of Rio Olympic Games gained much attention because its diving pool water was changed from blue to green.
However, on the morning of the 10th day of the month, the water of the match pool adjacent to the water pool also turned green.
Australian water polo contestant said that his eyes feel tingling and would like to shed tears.
Previously, Rio officials confirmed the situation of water greening, and said the water color is due to the weakening of alkaline reasons and will not affect the athlete's health.
However, after Australian players achieved success with the Japanese delegation in the water polo pool, they said their eyes felt pricking.
When the water of diving pool turned green, the hosting party worked overtime to deal with the diving pool problems in the evening of the 9th day of the month and found the rapid change of water polo pool in the morning of the 10th day of the month.
Mario Andrada, the spokesman of Rio Olympic Games said, "The alkalinity of water quality in the diving pool firstly turned weak after the yesterday afternoon".
The water sports center conducted a series of tests on water quality, and hundreds of divers and swimmers used the swimming pool to determine whether the water quality meets criteria. "
"We have been following the normal procedure these days, but we may have overlooked the impact of more athletes on water quality."
"We had hoped that the pool would return to normal color in the morning, but the speed of recovery was affected by the rain."
The police said that 10 prisoners asked to see the warden and complained about the transfer of prison matters, but the two sides mistime their marks. A prisoner threw grenades and caused an explosion.
Yesterday, the central Philippine police entered the prison of Leyte area, killing a torturer who "attempted assaulting the police".
At 8 O'clock of yesterday morning, around 10 buses packed with tourists parked around the Kempinski Hotel. These vehicles are mostly individual group that went for Tianchi One Day Tour.
Yu Bin, the working staff of law enforcement detachment of Urumqi Transportation Authority explained, "The foreign tourist bus and bus line worked on tourist transport project in Urumqi market, but they did not have qualification."
"A fine of 30,000 to 100,000 yuan will be imposed for operation beyond scope. The driver who did not have a qualification certificate will pay RMB 2,000 for fine."
It is reported that the Urumqi City Tourism Law Enforcement Department has investigated the places including West Park and Hongshan where the independent travelers are centralized.
After integrating the inspection twice, Ma Qi, the deputy head of Urumqi City Tourism Law Enforcement Detachment said that, "Safety first, norm second. No small matters for the travel vehicles. And people will be injured and killed in groups in case of any questions."
Sheng Yunyun, spokesman of National Bureau of Statistics and head of National Economic Statistics Division said that, in July, the part index number of national economy slowed relatively but still operated in the reasonable range.
Sheng Laiyun said, as for the national economy in July, I would like to use the words of Premier, "the shape is volatile and the potential is still good". This is a better way to summarize the characteristics of the economic operation in July.
As for the domestic situation, the whole economy is still in the critical stage of adjustment, adjustment labor pains are releasing and the economy is under great pressure, so some indicators are still fluctuating.
Sheng Laiyun pointed out that there was a special case in July, with serious floods, high temperature and hot weather which have brought some impact on production and operation of some areas.
He said, "The potential is still good" means that despite the fallback of economic growth, the overall economic performance is stable and steady. And the good momentum has not changed.
According to the statistics of hot weather in the districts and counties by the portal of the Chongqing Municipal Bureau of Meteorology, in addition to Youyang, the rest of the city can receive different degrees of high temperature allowance.
In case of temperature between 35 and 37 ℃, people can receive allowance of no less than 10 yuan per day. In case of temperature above 37℃, people are released with the allowance of not less than 15 yuan.
In case of temperature above 40℃, staff working in high temperature can receive up to 20 yuan per day of allowance (but for laborers who enjoy the high temperature job allowance).
At the same time, because the high temperature allowance is part of the wage and not welfare, such allowance shall be included in the total wages, with tax deducted.
So the high temperature allowance is not within the minimum wage, it must be issued in cash and not substituted by physical objects such as drinks.
There are a total of 30 channels on the east and west side of the waiting hall. Passengers can check the ticket on the ticket number for quick inspection and waiting.
If you need help, you can choose the 41 call buttons and get timely services.
From July 1 onwards, the old passenger station, that is, the passenger train of Urumqi South Station is shifted to Urumqi station.
Gracia is a cute female toucan, exuding the breath of tropical rain forest.
In Costa Rica, one of the Central American countries, Toucan Gracia and its story have long been known.
At the press conference on August 10, after postoperative rehabilitation, Gresham finally appeared and showed people its brand new 3D printing plastic beak.
This toucan, which had its beak broken and was dying just one year and a half ago, finally regained its new life.
This day not only announced that it has restored health by 100%, but also signaled its moving into the luxury aviary to meet its human friends.
In order to remind people that it has suffered damage, the technical staff did not give it a new beak color, but to retain the original white color of the 3D print material.
Despite this internal reinforcement, the toucan's beak is fragile and may be broken when it is hurt.
Animal rescue center, ornithologist and a US 3D printing company worked together to prepare several "test beak" for Gracia and finally built a "perfect beak" for it.
Now Gracia has been able to use the new beak to drink water, eat, and even peck fine grains.
In January 2015, Gracia, lying on a farm in the town of Alajuela in the middle of Costa Rica, was found with blood covering on its body.
At that time, its beak was cruelly broken by a group of young people. It was completely unable to eat and dying.
After the tragedy of the Gracia was reported by the media, there are a tide of animal anti-abuse call occurring inside and outside Costa Rica.
People came spontaneously to try their utmost to help Gracia restore its life before hurting.
"The situation of Gracia is very special, and its remaining part of the beak is less than 1 centimeter, so there are many difficulties in installing the new beak."
"We first scanned Gracia and then designed and produced an extended prosthesis slightly longer than the rest of its beak and fixed on its beak with glue."
"This can reduce the risk of further intrusive damage to Gracia," Lange told Xinhua International.
Before installing the prosthesis, the staff cleared the broken beak of Gracia every day to prevent infection.
Thousands of miles away, the story of the Toucan Gracia touched the famous documentary director Paula El Reidia and the news channel producer John Hoffman.
The documentary "The State of the Toucan" shows people how a small Toucan has changed a country and how people get involved in the fight against torture of animals.
Core Tip: Japanese oil companies expressed vigilance to the rise of Chinese oil companies, especially known as the "teapot" of China's small independent refinery.
Japanese oil companies expressed vigilance to the rise of Chinese oil companies, especially known as the "teapot" of China's small independent refinery.
Before obtaining the import license for crude oil, "teapot refinery" generally refines oil from the heavy oil, which has high sulfur content and is imported from Russia.
After obtaining crude oil import license, "teapot refinery" can import Oman crude oil and Russian crude oil, which have low sulfur content and improved petroleum products.
Although the "Japanese high quality oil" falls into a crisis, the Japanese oil companies just adopted the strategy of "exporting to profitable areas while being concerned about the market".
As China's exports of petroleum products have a huge impact on the Asian market, teapot refinery got more attentions.
2016 Liqun sunshine student support action of Yangtze Evening News started from May 26. After two months of registration, the total number of poor students applying for grants is up to 800.
During the educational process, more than 1.2 million yuan of social donations has been obtained (the detailed donations are publicized in five batches). This can help at least 240 young students achieve their college dream.
"Liqun sunshine student action" is a well-known Chinese charity brand. Yangzi Evening News Liqun sunshine student action has been initiated in Jiangsu since 2003. More than 4,000 students have been supported.
The scope of the fund covers college entrance freshmen, excluding tuition-free majors. Students qualified for the fund should have excellent study performance and family poverty.
According to the statistics bureau, the population growth of New Zealand had previously exceeded 2% in 1974 and during the 1950s-1960s ("baby boom").
As of August 11 this year, the Xinzhu station opened a total of 221 freight trains and 10,009 vehicles. A total of 338,000 tons of goods have been transported. Among them, 84 freight trains began operation in 2016, a year-on-year increase of 47%.
It is understood that the first carriage of goods of Sino-Asia freight trains are "Made in Shaanxi". And now, it has attracted a large number of foreign sources.
As of the end of July, the volume of container received for Sino-Asia freight trains reached 64,000 TEU, an increase of 8% over the same period in 2015.
A mid-aged man in India last week experienced airplane belly landing shock at Dubai International Airport. He won US$1 million award in the same airport last week.
His 21-year-old son suffered from paralysis due to accidental fall 13 days after his birth. He has toiled day in day out to repay his son's medical expenses loan.
"After escaping from the crash, it is god who gave me the second life and then lent me the money to let me do the good", said Hedar.
Although now it is the beginning of autumn, the power of "afterheat" seems not to be weaker at all than that in the summer.
UV not only tans your skin but also sunburns it, so how to make the skin go through the military training, without sunburn?
The product marked with PA is for UVA, so that sunblock will play a more effective role. Usually, the intensity of PA is represented with +. An extra + indicates extension of effective protection time.
Water-based sunblock with a strong penetration is often applied to oily skin. Sunscreen spray is also a good choice.
Creamy sunscreen is often applied to dry skin. The classification of neutral skin generally has no strict rules. Any kind of skin care products are burden to the sensitive skin. So it is recommended to choose pure physical sunscreen products.
After exposure under the blazing sun for quite a long time, please wrap the ice with towel to ease the sunburned skin and alleviate the local heat if condition allowed.
The cumulative subsidy policy will be remain available for buying agricultural machinery during the exhibition and farmers can get agricultural subsidies of up to 40%.
It is reported that the reason for "Hunan Fair" to be settled in Loudi for seven consecutive years is the strong foundation of manufacturing industry in Loudi, Hunan, which boasted long history of industrial development.
As the host place of "Hunan Exposition", Loudi has established trade relationship with more than 90 countries around the world.
Although the stable ionizing layer with a large number of free electrons may help people listen to the radio at the edge of a university radio station, but this may not be the interest of the US Air Force.
Ionization layer full of electrons indicated the radio used by the military has a larger range of broadcasts. In addition, it may prevent the global positioning system (GPS) signal from the solar storm.
Over the past decade, the State Council has issued a total of five notices for the elimination of excessive and backward production capacity.
And since February, coal prices gradually picked up, Qinhuangdao steam coal prices rose continuously for four weeks, rose to 16 months high, once climbed to 436 yuan per ton, up nearly 70 yuan per ton over the beginning.
In this regard, Kuang Xianming, head of the Economic Research Institute of the China (Hainan) Reform and Development Institute, conducted an analysis and interpretation.
Kuang Xianming: overcapacity cut roused the high concerns to various industries. The report card of the overcapacity cut of the coal industry announced today make everyone feel worried indeed.
These three superficial factors reflect the reason behind the relative lagging behind of our growth pattern change. That is, the government-led growth has not yet been fundamentally changed.
Second, it is also directly related with the force of local government. During the overcapacity cut process, the funds and the corresponding supporting measures should be in place. From this point of view, the differences are indeed relatively large among different regions.
Thirdly, some of the provinces that are relatively slow in progress may face greater risks if they seek acceleration in progress in the second half of the year.
During the process of overcapacity cut deploying, the local government must combine the production capacity and the transformation and upgrading of the coal industry to develop the relevant service industry.
Second, in order to complete this year's overcapacity cut task within this year, we must give full play to the power of administrative supervision.
"The reason for the ranking decline is that Brazilian GDP growth is expected to worsen in the medium term."
"There are 288 'green land investment' projects in Brazil, with an average annual rise of 314 from 2003 to 2014".
Title: Canadian police killed IS supporters: homemade bomb attacks downtown preparations near the end
The taxi company said the taxi was dispatched to the Dreyfus before the police arrived.
Canadian police said at a news conference on Wednesday that the information received by the police included the "martyrdom video" sent by the young man to the US Federal Bureau of Investigation. According to the video, the young man will launch strike.
According to the German voice, in the video, a man wearing a black Barakella hat is reading the "Koran", referred to the crime against Muslims, and vowed to attack a Canadian city sooner.
The incident is the first time for the police to kill terror suspects before the incident after Canadian Prime Minister Justin Trudeau came to power last year.
Beijing-Hangzhou Grand Canal branch channels Old Wanfu River and Beidaliu will charge tolls since September 1.
The old Wanfu River channel flows through Jinxiang, Yu Tai and then through the Nanyang Lake into the Beijing-Hangzhou Grand Canal main channel, with a total length of 32.5 km.
The channel flows through Jinxiang County, Rencheng area and then through the Nanyang Lake into the Beijing-Hangzhou Grand Canal main channel, with a total length of 19 km.
In accordance with the "loan construction and charging for repaying loan" principle, Jining City Anping Canal Logistics Service Center will collect channel tolls according to the charge standard approved by Shandong Provincial Price Bureau.
Among them, the basic toll is 1.75 yuan/dwt and mileage toll is 0.05 yuan/km dwt.
Reporters learned from Jining Port and Waterway Bureau that there are a total of 4 toll channels within Jining territory, including Zhushuihe Channel, Baima River Channel, Beidahang Channel and Laowanfu Channel.
These four channels are Beijing-Hangzhou Grand Canal tributary channels, which are upgraded and renovated in the way of social financing.
Zhushuihe Channel Upgrade Renovation Project is the first project adopting the mode of "government + market" for the infrastructure construction of river and ports within Shandong province. The government accounts for the major part of investment while social fund supplements the funding gap.
Ning Zetao's performance in the 100 meters freestyle semi-final has made a lot of Chinese audience speechless.
Actually, this 50-meter freestyle is not the subject of Ning Zetao. His performance and best achievement in Kazan World Championships also indicate it is not possible for him to make breakthrough in this project.
Sure enough, Ta Kung Pao, an authoritative media in Hong Kong, revealed that the biggest reason for Ning Zetao to lose is that he has lost interest in swimming.
Many factors may have a great impact on his future ideas. He is now more interested in entering the entertainment circle.
After Kazan World Championships, Ning Zetao instantly become celebrity with his good look and excellent performance.
As a result, "national husband (a good match)", "fresh little meat", "gorgeous", etc. have become his label.
A variety of business activities came to him. He really have a golden flashing prospect.
In this case, that Ning Zetao chooses to withdraw and joins the entertainment circle, is not only his freedom, but also a seemingly viable way.
After all, he is only 23 years old. After a certain degree of study, he can perform some TV series with his popularity.
But Ning Zetao needs to see whether he is qualified enough compared with his predecessors.
The beautiful appearance of Liu Xuan makes her quickly remembered and also lays a foundation for her to join the entertainment circle.
But when he was defeated by his counterpart Hu Jia at the single 10-meter match in the 2004 Olympic Games, Tian Liang's competitive state slipped and it was said he was dismissed by the diving team.
But when he took along his daughter to participate in the variety show "Dad, Where Are We Going?", he became a focus.
The once gold generation Yang Wei, Li Xiaopeng and Chen Yibing all participated in a variety of variety show.
It is worth mentioning that, Yang Wei and Li Xiaopeng led the Chinese team and won champion in the 2008 Olympic Games men's team. Yang Wei even got his individual all-around gold medal twice and was called as the Almighty King.
And Chen Yibing has become a ring king while leading his team to win the champion in the 2012 Olympic Games men's team.
But after he was misjudged and lost the gold in the London Olympic Games, his magnanimous act won him so many funs.
However, these game players mainly focus on the venue, they just touch and then go at the variety show.
After all, athletes have just stepped into a new area, so it is just a space state for them in case of capabilities and connection.
Even for Tian Liang and Liu Xuan, who are not new in the entertainment circle, common people always think of their performance at the Olympic Games when mentioning them.
And the introduction of Yang Wei and Li Xiaopeng at the variety show is always Olympic Games Champion.
Compared with these people, Ning Zetao is slightly weaker for the title of Swimming World Championships.
Compared with these people, the title of Ning Zetao, a swimming world championship, is not so great.
Moreover, compared with the withdrawal of Tian Liang, Liu Xuan and Yang Wei, etc. at their peaks, the withdrawal of Ning Zetao at 23 after some setback would cause immeasurable effects to the negative influence of his image.
After all, at the mention of athletes, people's requirements on athletes are "not seeking victory but for no fear of danger". Ning Zetao lags far behind from this point.
At the very least, Ning Zetao can totally rely on his great looks to win the support of thousands of huge fans.
It is a lot more difficult to be famous in the entertainment circle by just relying on good appearance than training.
You have to listen to your inner voice on your life path. But as for how to choose, Ning Zetao should be quite conscious.
Expanding the interpersonal relationship circle, more equal dialogue, avoiding social concerns are major reasons for us to be fascinated with online chat.
New comers in the company love online exchange with colleagues. "We are not familiar with each other when we just come to the company. The likes and comments on social platform makes people much closer to one another. "
People who love to make friends also love online communication. "I lost contact with my friends due to some misunderstandings. We became familiar again after a few dialogues on the group chatting."
IT engineer Wu Yan is a profound social networking lovers. His majority social life occurred online and his online contact is several times than that of offline friends.
Wu Yan himself admitted that the network is more "in his element".
"You can respond to your friends when you are willing, because there is a lot of time to think over the words and you can express it more clearly.
"People of different identities have the same rights and efficiency to speech. Various social concerns during real life may be eliminated immediately on internet."
However, Xiaopeng, a friend of Wu Yan, thought that Wu Yan is a "very boring otaku."
Xiaopeng and Wuyan meet each other in the group chatting. They two get familiar with each other because they are active speakers.
Xiaopeng thought that Wuyan is quite different from the one on internet. He is quite bored and does not take the initiative to express his views. His words are repeated like this, "Oh, yes, right", or "I will check it online".
"The conflict on August 4 has not yet obtained investigation results. Around 0 o'clock on August 11, the taxi of another two drivers was smashed in the residence. "
"Now the tricycle is mostly and illegally operated at night. We hope the competent authorities can also intensify efforts to carry out renovation."
The next step is that, the transport sector will apply to the county government and work with several departments to enhance their input on rectifying the county's tricycles, motorcycles, and unlicensed taxi, etc.
At 8 am on August 11, Qilu Evening News reporter follows the "Health Chinese" clinic service group to go to Hegou village, West Lake Township, Donggang District.
The village is located in the remote area, about 24 km from the urban area. There are more than 200 households in the village. This has caused many inconveniences for many middle-aged patients due to economic, transportation and physical limitations.
The 67-year-old Xue suffers from congenital scoliosis, and in recent years she has been troubled by "asthma", so she panted and was breathless even walking on the slope.
Doctors told Xue that it was almost impossible to cure chronic bronchitis and such problems may be alleviated with medication.
The little grandson was aged 11 years old. He was plagued with barbiers at his left foot since 3 years old.
After examination, the doctor told the old man that this was not barbiers but seasonal eczema. And the doctor advised him not to use medication arbitrary to avoid treatment delay.
Because there are serious business irregularities, business stagnation or the application for the termination of business types of some payment agencies, etc., this renewal will reduce its business scope.
The People's Bank of China will continue to carry out the renewal of "Payment Business License" in accordance with the law.
Two earthquakes with magnitude 4.4 and 4.5 respectively struck Tibet's Nima County. No casualties were caused temporarily.
The attending leaders awarded together for the second batch of "Love Yuanshan" Leifeng private fleet.
In front of each major disaster, the Yuanshan people are spontaneously organizing donations and lend a helping hand to the community.
After the ceremony, all activity participants visited Shandong Yuanshan Hard Work Commemorative Museum and watched the construction of barrier-free facilities.
Recently, the 10th China International Folk Art Festival, hosted by the China Federation of Literary and Art Circles and the Qinghai Provincial Government, kicked off in Xining, Qinghai province.
On the 11th day of the month, the Tajikistan "Avesta" news agency, quoting the news of the central bank, said that the inflation rate of Tajikistan in the first 7 months of this year was 3.7%.
As indicated by the report, the inflation rate of Tajikistan was 3.7% in the first seven months. And the inflation rate in July was 0.6% while such rate in the past year was 6%.
On August 11, when the reporter called Huang Yilin, who was in his Mianyang home, she said, "At that time, it was too urgent. And there was just one idea, which is to rescue people!"
Majored in urban and rural planning, Huang Yilin wanted to visit Sichuan Langzhong and learn the local architectural design, so the family were bound for there.
At around 10 a.m. on August 8th, Huang Yilin's father was having a rest in the hotel, while Huang Yilin and his mother went to stroll the Langzhong ancient city.
Not walking too far, they saw a group of people shouting, so they approached for curiosity.
Seeing the "little boy has just disappeared and the little girl desperately fluttered in the water, just with her little brain left above the water and keeping sinking", Huang Yilin, who learned how to swim hurriedly jumped to rescue people.
After jumping into the water, the 165cm-tall Huang Yilin found that she cannot touch the bottom!
The calm-looking river had rapids in the bottom.
But she still desperately swam to the little girl.
Huang Yilin said the river was muddy and run fast. The only 5-meter distance almost wore her out.
She tried her best to push the little girl to the embankment. "The slope is particularly slippery, and I am afraid that I have no strength but to sink."
So Huang Yilin called to her mother for help. Hearing her daughter's call, Ms.Yin tried to rescue and was held up by other people.
On August 10, after the spread of the event of Huang Yilin's jumping into the river for rescue. Ms. Yin received the condolences and compliments of a lot of friends and relatives as well as the "concerns" of many relatives and friends.
"Now, in retrospect, it's really scared! To be honest, when my child does not hold on to the riverbank, my heart is broken soon."
Ms. Yin said with a lingering fear that, despite the danger, she will still support her daughter's choice and she is proud of her daughter even if she was placed in that scene again!
Because she was forced to learn swimming, she seldom went to swim after mastering the skill. "I did not expect this skill really to come in handy."
According to Chen Yiyang, her supervisor, Huang Yilin is the "The Straight A Student" well-known in her class and ready to help.
The opening ceremony of the first Youth Games of Yunnan Province on the 13th day of the month showed youth vitality
The first Youth Games in Yunnan Province will be held from August 13 to August 22 in De Hong Zhou Mang City.
On August 12, in De Hong Zhou Mang City, the organizing committee held a press conference to introduce the organization and the opening ceremony.
The renovation work of Dehong old weightlifting hall and martial arts museum, Mang City Yixiao Wrestling arena, Silver Tower Scenic Area mountain bike track has been completed.
As for the issues related with the opening and closing ceremonies, the lighting ceremony of the current Youth Games is combined the traditional sports characteristics of Yunnan ethnic minorities. In this way, the cultural connotation of Yunnan will be enriched.
Yunnan element will be fully integrated into the opening and closing ceremonies. Dehong characteristics will show the regional culture and folk customs features of De Hong Zhou Mang City.
In the morning of September 11, at Jining City Bus Company IC Card Sales Center, several elderly people are queuing to apply for a card. The 62-year-old Yao obtained his half-price card for the elderly.
"Eligible old people may apply to IC sales center with his second generation ID card. Elderly people in this age bracket and with foreign accounts can also enjoy the preferential policy."
Liu Xia, the deputy director of the computer center of Jining Bus Company, said that she managed more than 200 elderly half-price tickets since August 1.
Currently, old card is divided into two kinds, one for the elderly free card and the other one for the elderly half-price card.
"To save time for the elderly, the system is upgraded. The elderly free card is reduced from auditing twice per year to once per year. Elderly people with card do not need to commute twice."
People who sent a certain amount of mass fraud messages may be punished for crime of swindling even if they did not succeed in fraud.
In the same year, at 10 a.m. on October 5, 2009, the defendant once again came to a hotel room of Nanyang City Wolong District, where they sent fraud messages via a fake base station. He was arrested by the police.
As the defendant was attempted criminal, not resulting in terrible consequences and having good attitude toward admission of guilt while being caught, it is advisable to take the opinion of giving a lesser punishment.
Consider the comprehensive crime nature and the attitude toward admission of guilt of the defendant, he was sentenced to 4 years and 6 months of imprisonment, and fined 10,000 yuan.
Siberian tigers are currently classified as endangered (EN) by the World Conservation Union (IUCN) Red List of Endangered Species.
According to the Jilin Provincial Forestry Department, the data jointly monitored by the United States and Russia and other countries in 1998 showed that Jilin Province only had 4 to 6 manchurian tigers and 3 to 5 Northeast leopards.
According to Yu Changchun, the Director of Jilin Provincial Department of Forestry Protection, Jilin province has gradually enhanced its conservation on wild animals in recent years. The number of populations of manchurian tigers and Northeastern leopards is growing significantly
The cooperation between China and Russia is significant for the population restoration and reproduction of manchurian tigers and Northeastern leopards, which are flagship species for the wild animal protection in the Sino-Russia boundary area,.
At the 2016 China Hunchun Tiger and Leopard Protection International Forum which was terminated on September 11th, the forestry department and animal protection organization of China and Russia reached several consensuses for the second time.
Sun Fujian is a Party cadre, but he lost his ideal and belief by violently breaking the discipline of the Party after the 18th National Congress of the Communist Party of China. In addition, he is not astringent and breaks the rules. Such deed is vile and grave indeed.
The police immediately pursued and attacked the suspect on the internet and took a variety of measures to control. In addition, the police contacted their colleagues of other cities to investigate the whereabouts of Wang.
As the suspect is a stealing recidivism and repeatedly dealt with by the public security organs, he has strong anti-reconnaissance capabilities. In addition, due to his long-term drug abuse, the often drug addiction makes trial work quite difficult.
Greenland sharks are also known as small head sleeping sharks, widely distributed in Greenland and the North Atlantic waters around Iceland. It has the length of 4 to 5 meters in their adult age.
Traditional dating methods usually use calcified tissue of animals. Some fins can use fins, but this calcified tissue is very scarce in Greenland sharks.
A new study led by Julius Nelson of the University of Copenhagen, Denmark, turned to the use of Greenland shark's ocular lens for radioactive carbon dating.
Their analysis showed that the life span of the largest shark is estimated at 392 years old, with the error of 120 years old.
In addition, the female Greenland shark is alleged to be sexually matured at about 4 meters in length. That is, it can only reach adulthood at least until the age of 156.
From the point of market performance, over the past year, the two-way floating characteristics of RMB exchange rate is outstanding. The elasticity of exchange is expected to be strengthened and the exchange rate is expected to be generally stable.
Ever since the exchange reform, the fluctuation of RMB against the US dollar often appears, with ups and downs during the process.
Last year, the last remittance measure before "8.11" exchange reform was carried out in 2005. The appreciation of yuan against dollar was significant during the last 10 years.
Since the implementation of the new exchange reform, the previous appreciation state of RMB was changed. The central parity rate of RMB exchange rate in one year was about 8%.
While detecting the case at the same time, the police also pressed for payments and recovered stolen goods totaling more than 33 million yuan.
According to the theft gang members, they came to Shanghai in the way of chartering unlicensed taxi. Then they came down the taxi and gathered and took taxi several hours later. Finally, they left Shanghai together.
During the crime offence period, the criminal suspects swept the floor for theft from top to below by climbing the external wall and breaking the window fence.
In late August, Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe will go to Kenya to attend the 6th African Development Conference, according to the Evening News Peak of Voice of China.
The African Development Conference was dominated by Japan, and the previous five meetings were held in Tokyo, Japan or Yokohama, so this meeting will be the first move to Africa.
Africa has 53 seats in the United Nations and is therefore an important ticket bunker of the United Nation. How can Japan give up Africa if it wanted to join the United Nations Security Council?
Fumio Kishida, the current Minister for Foreign Affairs of Japan has also recently stated the intentions of the African Development Conference at the UN Security Council.
Abe has announced here that in order to stabilize the stability of sub-Saharan African countries, it will provide 100 billion yen (about RMB 6.1 billion) in five years.
However, from Junichiro Koizumi, who was Japan's prime minister 10 years ago, to the present Abe, Japan has repeatedly launched the "sprint" scheme. However, all schemes were abandoned eventually.
To achieve its own goals, Japan should firstly do a good job with the surrounding countries. And Japan needs to have a correct attitude no matter in geopolitical competition or in the national dispute or understanding of a historical problem.
Haikou Maritime Court registers a case in the early morning to ensure the rights and interests of litigants of Lingao sinking boat
The relatives of these 3 dead crew members rushed to Haikou Maritime Court at 4 a.m. on August 7 to submit the application of preserving property and seizing the suspected cargo ship before prosecution.
In view of the expiration of the 72 hours of detention period at 9:00 a.m. on August 7 in Maritime Bureau, the victims of relatives filed a deposit insurance application to the court in the morning of August 7.
At 4:20 a.m., the applicant filed a pre-litigation property preservation and were received patiently by judicial police on duty.
By then, Fan Deshang will conduct a comprehensive analysis of the above issues.
Fan Deshang is a Ph.D. in Peking University and a deputy director and secretary general of the Global Governance Research Center of Peking University. He was the former director of Cornell University in Beijing.
Traditional customs introduced a new bright spot "2016 Bon Culture Festival" -The Opening Ceremony of Victoria Park, Hong Kong
Gongs and drums of music, the traditional snacks, fancy decoration and stormy crowd scene.
In addition to the continuation of the existing "Climbing Competition", "parent basin for the heap" for the entire family is also added.
Bon culture history is introduced in the form of comic books. In addition, Bon theme 3D self-timer area, traditional snack area and traditional craft flow classroom are set up at the scene, attracting many friends and overseas travelers for visit.
A French couple lingered at the scene for almost 3 hours and experienced a lot in the mini flower card flow classroom.
"After knowing this special festival online, I decided to come and I felt quite fresh."
"We do not want to make the Bon Culture Festival very horrifying, which may spook people, especially the children," said Hu Yansong, the chief responsible person of the event.
"We hope that through the youthful activities and layout of the scene, so that young people know that the culture behind the Bon Festival is to express the filial piety and thanksgiving."
On the evening of the 11th day of the month, China National Peking Opera Theater took its famous TV play "White Snake" and traveled thousands of miles to Mexico City. They presented the local people with an authentic Peking Opera feast in the Mexican National Palace.
The audience sometimes smiled and sometimes applauded for the changing and concluding of the "White Snake" episode and the actor's singing.
I watched the performance of Marissa Jimenez Kachie accompanying her daughter in the Peking opera performance 15 years ago.
"This is a fantastic performance. Its music, lighting and stage performances are impressive to me ... ... I think it is necessary to let her daughter understand the Chinese culture and Chinese opera art."
The enthusiasm of Mexican audience left a deep impression on the young actress of lady white.
"It never occurred to me that the Mexican audience were so enthusiastic. I had some worries about whether they could understand the story, but it was beyond my expectation to see them catch the story and the laughter today.
Liu Cigui provided fully affirmation for the stage results and good experiences and practice.
We should lead in the urban and rural integration and tourism, accelerate the construction of characteristic town and integrate tourism into each project and build each village and town of Sanya into tourist attractions.
We should lead in "the 100-day social service investment move" and promote a batch of key projects and park construction to ensure the settlement of high-quality project and implement the various requirements of the big move.
In the 14 years of her sports career, Deng Yaping won a total of 18 world championships, becoming the first Chinese to win four Olympic gold medals in China's Olympic history.
She ranked first in the table tennis for 8 years to maintain the world's first and is a female athlete to rank as the "the world's first" for the longest time in the history of table tennis.
On September 26, 2010, she served as Deputy Secretary-General of People's Daily, general manager of People's Search Network Co., Ltd. and the department-level cadre.
Recently, she will work together with Yu Minhong to build the first domestic sports industry innovation and entrepreneurship platform.
There was also a team of star coaches in the Chinese sports circle. They were gorgeous in the era of athletes and won countless glory for the country. After retirement, they passed what they learned to the new comers and cultivated a great number of champions.
As the first world champion in Chinese men's gymnastics, Huang Yubin chose to pick up the pointer after retirement.
Since then, Tian Liang has been experiencing advertising endorsement. He has even served as a "Cowherd", "Lei Feng" and other important roles in recent years.
Many NBA players have proved their strength. But whenever there is progress, there is decline.
Whether it is because of the increase in age or limited playing time, some players will have regressive performance each season.
Of course, some "retreat" may only be data shrink, but the strength of these players may not have been reduced.
Even if Wade is still one of the league's best linebacker, his performance in the Bulls is not so good as that of the Heat.
The backcourt range of he and Londo is limited. The three-point hit rate of headed star Butler is just 32.8%, making their next-season offence quite challenging.
After coming to Feng Cheng, the Red Star will definitely give the ball right to Butler and Rondo and he himself choose to play healthy in the regular season.
Okafor's situation is more embarrassing. As the first choice of 76 people last season, he had to compete for playing time and ball right with Simmons and Enby in the new season.
This competition may not come soon. Simmons also need to adapt to the NBA stadium, and Enbi must also be fully recovered from the injury as soon as possible, but whether Okafor can have a position in the long array of 76 people.
Last season, 32% of the score of Okafor comes from the low attack. Such rate is higher than Cousins, Wuchevich and Brook Lopez, while his use rate is also the top 40 in the league.
With Simmons already showing a good point-forward potention, Enbi also has a better stature more suitable for NBA games and Okafor's position is hard to be so solid.
Over the past two seasons, Thompson's use rate has stabilized in the top 20 of the league and this is the best two seasons for his career.
But the problem is, with the arrival of Durant, Thompson's appearance ratio will surely decline, which is bound to affect his play.
This effect will not only be the impact of the number of shots, Thompson's holding attack in the next season will certainly be greatly reduced, which in some ways will reduce the opponent's defense difficulty.
Durant's arrival will certainly negatively affect the score of Warriors players, but the one with the most negative effect is probably that of Thompson.
But this does not mean that the level of Thompson steps backward. This is more likely that he made sacrifice for the team as a whole.
Parker had a better performance than last season. This is not only because his basket efficiency came to the highest level, his chemical reaction with Aldrich also benefits the Spurs.
Duncan retired, Ginobili announced a second battles for a year and the combination of GDP eventually came to an end. As one of the youngest among three people, the oil tank of French sports car is not much left.
After getting the third championship ring, only Jabbar, Jordan and Russell won more regular MVP than that of James, while Jordan was the only one who had more FMVP than that of James.
Oh, yes, James has just brought the first professional sports championship trophy in Cleveland in the past 52 years.
Therefore, in the regular season, James's capability is likely to further decline, he will give more weight to Owen to bear, but he will still easily become the league's top three players.
On the 12th day of the month of the local time, Huang Jing, chairman of the Moscow Overseas Chinese Association said excitedly while she saw the reporter of Chinanews.com.
Not long ago, she participated in the "overseas Chinese culture community Chinese talent (calligraphy, painting) training" hosted by Chinese State Council Overseas Chinese Affairs Office and sponsored by Jinan University.
While participating in the training course just now, she did not know where to start in painting and calligraphy. As a result, after the end of the course, she has been able to draw and write her own works.
At the same time, Na Yanwei, the Secretary-General of Russian-Chinese Culture Promotion Association who also participated in this training course had the same feeling.
She said, after she came back to Russia, she would surely carry out the traditional Chinese culture among the Chinese and the Russians who love Chinese culture.
At 19:35 today, in one match of the 22nd round of Chinese Football Association Super League, Chongqing Lifan Football Club challenged Beijing Guoan Talent Football Club in the visiting field.
At the 29th minute, Wang Dong led to scoring one ball. At the 39th minute, with assistance by Fernando, the new support Kardec won the first score of the Chinese Football Association Super League. At the 81st minute, Guoan regained a score.
When the match went on for 10 minutes, Lifan made continued hit and gained a chance for corner. Fernando made small-angle volley and was fended off the base line by Guoan.
At the 15th minute, Zhang Xizhe flip through in straight line of the midfield. Ilmaz has been straight for the penalty area and the defensive Liu Yu grab the first leg of the ball and made a fight.
One minute later, Pu Cheng crossed on the left wing and Yu Dabao strafed the unkicked-out part of the mid-way in the penalty area. Lifang goalkeeper Deng Xiaofang confiscated the goal.
Fernando flipped pass the goal in the back-drawing on his right wing. Alan Kardec was put down by Lei Tenglong. The referee sentenced a spot kick and showed a yellow card to Lei Tenglong.
Guoan changed a person at the 37th minute. Zhang Xiaobin left the playing field and Zhang Chiming came on the stage and turned his weapon around to defense.
This is also the time for Alan Kardec to score in the initial games of Chinese Football Association Super League. Lifan leads in 2:0.
Just in the beginning of the next half, Fernando won any score on the right side by breaking off. It is a pity that he lobbed in small angle.
After Deng Xiaofei received a yellow card in the delaying time, Peng Xinli who is alternative also received a yellow card because he fouled in front of the penalty area.
At the 56th minute, Zhang Chiming hit in his left dribble and worked to transfer with Zhang Xizhe. He was fended off by Deng Xiaofei at the curling shot.
Liu Yu forcefully tackled and intruded Egor Krimets. He and the exciting Wang Dong got the yellow card.
At the 63rd minute, Fernando was knocked down by Egor Krimets when he conducted long-range strike. Fernando was quite dissatisfied with the move of Egor Krimets. Egor Krimets got a yellow card.
One minute later, Fernando showed his long-range raid capability at the right wing. Yu Dabao fouled and also got a yellow card.
Ilmaz restricted area within the line forcibly break, in Zheng Yurong leg to stop the action down to the ground, the referee to determine the penalty, Ilmaz surgeon, Lifan 2: 1 national security.
At the 86th minute, Zhou Ting sent the cross along the right wing. Sergeyev looped after chesting at the mid-way of the penalty area and shot. Deng Xiaofei sent the ball out with wonderful shoot.
4 minutes after the allowance, Lifan kept the 2-1 score to the final and defeated Guoan in the visiting field.
After taking the valuable 3 points, Lifan obtained a total of 27 scores, temporarily ranking the 10th at the scoreboard.
Lyman will become an expert for the partner of German Bundesliga Asia media and will participate in a variety of local fan activities.
According to reports, this fall, the Bundesliga ambassador Lyman and Matthaeus will represent the Bundesliga in Asia and the America to continue the legendary tour and start outpost for the opening ceremony of the 2016/17 German Bundesliga season.
The event will cover two continents and four top cities. They will work for the preheating of the new season with fans.
As one of the world's most powerful league, the Bundesliga attracted about 13.3 million spectators to come to the stadium just in 2014-2015 season.
The representatives of Bundesliga, Bayern Munich, Dortmund and the famous star Thomas Muller, Ram and Goetze have become a household name in China.
With the microblogging, Youku and WeChat Chinese platform of German Bundesliga, which went online previously, German Bundesliga hopes to provide a more extensive and timely and convenient channels to obtain the latest news of the league.
Britain settle for silver in rugby sevens after Fiji masterclass sees them take gold
Great Britain's impressive run in the Rugby 7s was brought to a crashing halt at the final hurdle by Fiji in the final on Thursday night when they were comprehensively beaten 43-7 at the Deodoro Stadium here in Rio.
Fiji gave a masterclass in handling, off-loading, side-stepping, support play, running lines and brute strength to win gold - their first Olympic medal of any colour.
Defeat came with the non-too shabby consolation of silver - Britain's third of the day - and they could be proud of their efforts in the inaugural Olympic 7s tournament in which they beat New Zealand, Argentina and South Africa along the way.
The bruising beating of the Boks, 7-5 in the semi-final earlier in the day, may have come back to bite them in the final.
But, regardless, Fiji on this form would have beaten a fit as a fiddle 15-man team.
It may be some consolation to GB - but probably not - that at least one Briton will have a gold medal around his neck tomorrow: Fiji's head coach is Ben Ryan, the former England boss from Wimbledon.
It has been some journey for GB.
Here, they lost just one.
This hammering will hurt but the progress is startling.
Fiji started magnificently, bouncing off GB tackles for fun.
It was like running into a series of moving buses for captain Tom Mitchell and co and the World Series champions went 5-0 up when Osea Kolinisau dived over in the corner.
With four minutes on the clock Jerry Tuwai added another down the right wing, which was converted.
12-0 and GB had hardly touched the ball.
A superb Mitchell tackle stopped the man-mountain Leone Nakarawa from scoring a third but it was only delaying Fiji.
On seven minutes Jasa Veremalua touched down in the right corner and GB were 17-0 to the bad.
Nakarawa added another from the restart and there was still over a minute on the clock ... in the first half.
Vatemo Ravouvou then burst through some more limp GB tackling and stormed to the line to score.
It was as if Fiji had been born to play 7s, while GB are still learning the trade.
GB made wholesale changes at half-time and they plugged the Fijian dam...for all of four minutes, which by first-half standards was good, until Josua Tuisova went over after some brilliant Fijian interplay.
Dan Norton grabbed a try for GB, touching down in the left corner to make it 36-7 but the game was long gone the way of the South Sea Islanders whose fans sang, waved flags and danced in the stands.
It was hard not to admire Fiji's whole joyful approach.
Mata Viliame iced the Fijian cake that didn't need icing with another try in the dying moments.
The whistle went, the Fijians embraced and GB hit the turf, thoroughly beaten.
Earlier in the day, Fiji had beaten Japan 20-5 in their semi-final and GB edged South Africa in a tight semi-final of one try each - Britain's conversion the difference.
Kyle Brown put the Boks ahead in the first half but Dan Norton with some dazzling footwork broke the line and scored under the posts in the second half.
A brilliant late tackle from Marcus Watson, brother of England's 15-aside team, Anthony, secured the win - and ultimately the silver medal.
Helen Glover and Heather Stanning inspired to rowing victory by coach's cancer battle
There will not be a more emotive gold at these games, and that is saying something.
From the first stroke to the last, 220 punishing heaves into history, Helen Glover and Heather Stanning found added meaning in their golden moment at the Estacio da Lagoa.
Though they were the two pulling on the oars, there were three voices in that boat, the echo of coach Robin Williams ever present as they powered to a second successive Olympic gold in the women's pairs, the first females in the annals of British sport to scale such a height.
Their dominance was absolute, after all this was their 39th outing unbeaten, again unprecedented.
What we see, two brilliant athletes skating over the surface with the elegance of swans, does not wholly reflect the nature of the triumph.
Behind every rowing gold is a battalion of willing hands contributing the incremental gains that make the difference, and no hands were more instrumental than those of a coach who 30 months ago did not know whether he would live to see this day when diagnosed with cancer.
As he said, it was touch and go.
I had bladder cancer which is one of the things they can operate on and they did.
If they don't it goes everywhere.
It alters your outlook a bit.
Williams was diagnosed in December 2013.
The trio were fortunate that he was able to begin his treatment at the start of 2014 out of season, keeping the disruption to a minimum, if that is ever the right expression in circumstances such as these.
I needed to get paid so I had to get better quickly.
It was an incentive.
I was in hospital and I was walking around the ward - 20ft, 30ft 50ft at a time when they were saying a few steps is enough.
That's how it starts off.
Rowing in itself is a journey but that makes it a bit bigger.
In the immediacy of victory their first thoughts were for Williams, who had spent a nervy morning talking a little more than usual in an attempt to process his own anxieties.
Stanning, a captain in the Royal Artillery regiment with a tour of Afghanistan behind her, said "I've been an emotional wreck this week, maybe that's a bit extreme, but it means such a lot."
It just reiterates how much this means to me, how much me and Helen have worked and Robin as well.
It's been a fantastic three years back with Helen and Robin.
Without Robin we would be nobody, so a massive thanks to him he's the best coach in the world.
I couldn't have asked for a better person to train with, or a better coach.
The pair set a punishing rhythm that their rivals could never match.
Even in the final 500 metres when the crews from New Zealand and Denmark began to close, Stanning and Glover had too much in reserve.
We were very much in the moment.
Helen was calling 'stay in the process, stay in the process'.
It's really important not to get carried away.
We had a good start and at the same time we weren't looking to do anything amazing.
We weren't looking for fireworks today, we were just looking to do a good row and to go out and win that race, which we did.
The pair will take a year before deciding their futures.
Glover has a wedding to attend next month, her own to television adventurer Steve Backshall.
In London it took about six months to realise that I was an Olympic champion.
Here it took about four minutes.
This feels so much better," she said.
A front-row seat to the stunning architecture of the Los Angeles Central Library
Gee and Schwartzman are scheduled to discuss and share images of the 1926 Bertram Goodhue design as well as the 1993 restoration and addition by Hardy Holzman Pfeiffer Associates.
The salon is set for 2 p.m. to 4 p.m. on Aug. 21 in the Salle Moderne at the Art Deco Southwestern School of Law, (formerly Bullocks Wilshire), 3050 Wilshire Blvd.
Advance tickets are required; SAH/SCC members, $15; non-members, $25.
An open, industrial loft in DTLA gets a cozy makeover
Celebrating L.A.'s Central Library's 90th birthday with - what else? - a new book
Bulgaria Posts Inflation for 1st Time in 8 Months
This is the highest value in years (since June 2012) and the first one above zero since October of last year when a positive 0.2% was posted.
The annual average inflation, measured by CPI, in the last 12 months (August 2015 - July 2016) compared to the previous 12 months (August 2014 - July 2015) was -0.8%.
Snapchat "Anime" Effect Is Criticized as Asian Caricature
Snapchat says this filter is inspired by anime, but some observers say it's racially insensitive.
With its lens tool, Snapchat allows some 150 million daily users to alter reality and play with identity in ways that border on the absurd.
You can turn yourself into a pineapple, a dog or a character befitting a Roy Lichtenstein painting.
The lenses are blunt, feature-warping tools that generate more than 30 million enhanced selfies a day.
Snapchat lenses have drawn criticism in the past with accusations that the app was promoting blackface or encouraging whitened skin tones as an ideal of beauty.
So when it pushed a lens to some users this week that gave them slanted eyes, distorted teeth and puffy cheeks, some critics called it a racist caricature of Asian people - "yellowface."
And they wondered if these repeated controversies pointed to a larger problem that the company has with diversity.
The news and the outrage went wide on Wednesday, with reports by The Verge and Motherboard, a day after Snapchat said it had dismantled the feature.
But for observers who have experienced racism, the lens reminded them of hurtful stereotypes in action.
Others roundly rejected the anime comparison.
In an email, Grace Sparapani, a Korean American art student whose tweet about the photos was widely shared, said that the lens was "hurtful and uncomfortable to say the least."
She added that "it's hard to argue with the side by side comparison of the very gross Asian caricature and the filter's effects.
It shows that the filter isn't just yellowface, but yellowface taken to its derogatory extreme.
Snapchat is not the only company to cross these cultural tripwires.
American culture seems involved in an endless struggle over diversity and inclusion, from corporate boardrooms to Hollywood and the devices we all carry in our hands.
And Snapchat's huge audience of younger people - who are more racially diverse than their older counterparts - might mean that they are even more likely to expect sensitivity.
When one of Snapchat's lenses creates an image that is insulting to a user, 25-year-old Katie Zhu said in an interview on Thursday, "it's much harder for these types of things to go unnoticed like they did before."
Ms. Zhu criticized the company's mostly white, all-male leadership and ended her essay with a hashtag: #DeleteSnapchat.
"It's either that they had no diverse representation of people of color on their staff to the point where they're able to make decisions like this," Ms. Zhu, who is Chinese-American, said, "or they do have some people of color who are working there, but they're not on positions where they feel safe or comfortable to speak up."
Other observers share her view, a complaint that Snapchat has left largely unanswered.
The company does not release figures about diversity on its staff, noting its status as a private company.
On Thursday, Snapchat declined to discuss the racial backgrounds of its staff, but according to a spokesman, the company recently hired a recruiter to focus on underrepresented populations and on driving inclusion efforts internally.
For her part, Ms. Zhu said she would keep her Snapchat account closed, adding, "I wonder if they actually need more users like us to be able to say that this is not O.K."
Military Officials Distorted ISIS Intelligence, Congressional Panel Says
Officials from the United States Central Command altered intelligence reports to portray a more optimistic picture of the war against the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria than events on the ground warranted, a congressional panel said in a report issued Thursday.
"Intelligence products approved by senior Centcom leaders typically provided a more positive depiction of U.S. antiterrorism efforts than was warranted by facts on the ground and were consistently more positive than analysis produced by other elements of the intelligence community," a news release about the report said.
"What happened at Centcom is unacceptable - our war fighters suffer when bad analysis is presented to senior policy makers," said Representative Ken Calvert, Republican of California.
The leadership failures at Centcom reach to the very top of the organization.
The 10-page report detailed persistent problems in 2014 and 2015 in Central Command's description and analysis of American efforts to train Iraqi forces.
Although it offers no definitive evidence that senior Obama administration officials ordered the reports to be doctored, it describes analysts as feeling as though they were under pressure from Centcom leaders to present a more optimistic view of the threat posed by the Islamic State, also known as ISIS or ISIL.
"Throughout the first half of 2015, many Central Command press releases, statements and congressional testimonies were significantly more positive than actual events," the report said.
For example, a Centcom official stated publicly that a major military assault to take back Mosul could begin as early as April or May 2015.
"After months of investigation, this much is very clear," Representative Mike Pompeo, Republican of Kansas, said in a statement.
From the middle of 2014 to the middle of 2015, the United States Central Command's most senior intelligence leaders manipulated the command's intelligence products to downplay the threat from ISIS in Iraq.
Republicans created the task force after learning that analysts had raised concerns that intelligence about the Islamic State was being manipulated.
"Between 2014 and 2015, Centcom created an overly insular process for producing intelligence assessments on ISIL and Iraqi Security Forces," Representative Adam B. Schiff, the committee's top Democrat, said in a statement.
But Mr. Schiff and the Democrats said they found no evidence that the White House tried to pressure Centcom analysts to fit their conclusions to a "preset or political narrative."
The preliminary results of the congressional investigation were reported Tuesday by The Daily Beast.
Last August, The New York Times reported the existence of the Pentagon inspector general investigation, opened after complaints by Centcom analysts.
Lt. Cmdr. Patrick Evans, a Pentagon spokesman, said in a statement that the Defense Department would not comment on the congressional report while the inspector general's investigation continued.
The investigation has repercussions beyond the question of whether the American-led bombing campaign in Iraq and Syria is succeeding (an assertion now made by a growing number of Defense officials).
Mr. Hooker also played a key part in the insurrection over the Islamic State intelligence.
Centcom's commander then, Gen. Lloyd J. Austin III, came under criticism last year after Senate testimony viewed by many lawmakers as being an overly positive assessment of the war.
U.S. Wins 4th Straight in Women's Field Hockey, Setting Up Showdown With Britain
One day after scoring three goals in a 6-1 victory over Japan, Katie Bam scored the first two goals for the United States women's field hockey team on Thursday as the Americans defeated India, 3-0.
I'm not really one of those people who keeps track of their goals.
Here is what she does know: The Americans are 4-0 in the Olympic tournament and are tied for first place in their group with Britain, which remained unbeaten after defeating Japan, 2-0, on Thursday.
The first-place finisher will avoid the powerful Dutch, the leaders of the other bracket, for a bit longer when the quarter finals begin.
However Saturday's game turns out, the Americans have created a stir with their surprising run here, four years after finishing last among 12 teams at the London Games.
She grew up in Blue Bell, Pa., first picked up a field hockey stick when she was 3 (her twin older sisters played the sport at Drexel) and joined the national team when she was 16, becoming its youngest player ever.
We didn't have the work rate in London that we have now.
We've made a complete turnaround.
On Thursday night, Bam opened the scoring in the first half with a backhand shot from close in.
India had come into the game without a victory in the tournament, but the team proved surprisingly tough and kept the score 1-0 until late in the third period, when Bam took charge.
She made a long run with the ball down the left side of the field, then curled into the middle and whipped the ball into the goal to give the Americans a 2-0 lead.
Melissa Gonzalez added the final goal midway through the fourth period.
The shutout was the first of the tournament for the United States goalie, Jackie Briggs, who had allowed one goal in each of the first three victories.
She is on a roll.
"We're in a good place right now," Parnham said, but just how good it is will depend on the result of Saturday's game.
The Depressing Food of the Depression, in "A Square Meal"
A gourmand, President Roosevelt had a taste for fancy Fifth Avenue foods like pâté de foie gras and Maryland terrapin soup.
His menu that day was more humble: deviled eggs in tomato sauce, mashed potatoes and, for dessert, prune pudding.
"It was an act of culinary solidarity with the people who were suffering," Jane Ziegelman said.
The couple, who live in Brooklyn Heights, are food historians.
Mr. Coe's last book, "Chop Suey," was about Chinese cuisine in America, while Ms. Ziegelman told the story of life in a Lower East Side tenement through food in her book "97 Orchard."
Their new, collaborative work, "A Square Meal," which will be published Tuesday by Harper, is a history of American food in the Great Depression.
Showing some culinary solidarity of their own, they met a reporter for dinner at Eisenberg's Sandwich Shop, a tiny no-frills lunch counter in the Flatiron district that has been in business since the year of the crash, 1929.
Ms. Ziegelman, 54, ordered a cream cheese and chopped olive sandwich, while Mr. Coe, 57, had the turkey, mashed potatoes and vegetable medley.
When a reporter ordered meatloaf, the couple deemed it fitting for a discussion of Depression-era eating.
"Loaves were very popular," Ms. Ziegelman said.
There was peanut loaf, liver loaf, bean loaf.
They were made from an ingredient and a cheap thing that stretches the ingredient out.
Imagine eating enough peanuts to serve as your dinner.
Mr. Coe grimaced.
"It must have sat in your stomach like lead," he said.
In the years before the Depression, the American table, especially in rural areas, was an all-you-can-eat buffet.
Teams of women cooked for male farmworkers, and fresh-baked pie was served at breakfast, lunch and dinner.
It was Americans who had sent food to starving Europeans during World War I. "A Square Meal" chronicles the ways the nation coped with suddenly not being the land of plenty.
"This was a time when food became a central, fraught subject for the American people," Mr. Coe said, explaining why he and his wife wanted to write about it.
Equally fraught was the new budget diet: Mystery dishes like loaves and casseroles became staples, the casserole a "wonderful way to repurpose leftovers," Ms. Ziegelman noted, because cooks could hide unappetizing ingredients under a creamy coating of sauce.
Meat, for years the center of the American meal, became a sparingly apportioned luxury.
Strange mashups were tried as caloric and nutritional fulfillment took precedent over taste or even common kitchen sense.
In researching the book, which includes recipes, Ms. Ziegelman prepared a period dish of baked onion stuffed with peanut butter.
"It was not a popular addition to the dinner table," Mr. Coe said.
Ms. Ziegelman amplified: "It was surreal."
Peanut butter has nothing to say to a baked onion.
It was characteristic of a lot of the home-ec recipes.
Publishing recipes and articles in newspapers and magazines, they encouraged women to become "budgeteers" and rise to the challenge of transforming glop like creamed spaghetti with carrots into tasty dishes.
"A Square Meal" is a feast of historical tidbits.
Especially savory are the accounts of the government's response to its hungry citizenry, like President Herbert Hoover's let-me-eat-cake attitude.
While he publicly praised the simple Iowa farmhouse cooking of his childhood, he dined like the millionaire sophisticate he had become.
"He liked to eat Continental cuisine, like fish with cucumber sauce," Mr. Coe said.
He ate in almost a gold-plated dining room, wearing a dinner jacket.
He was fabulously out of touch.
President Roosevelt may have committed the same error if his wife, Eleanor, had not encouraged him to set an example with his stomach.
As the book tells it, Mrs. Roosevelt's hiring of a housekeeper with no interest in flavor resulted in a White House that "put out not only some of the dreariest food in Washington but also some of the most dismally prepared."
Many of the Depression-era food ways were abandoned as soon as the country got back on its feet.
The legacy is in our continued focus on calories and nutrition, Ms. Ziegelman said, and on the way science has been applied to cooking.
Ms. Ziegelman recalled: "She actually got people sick."
There was the cream-puff incident.
After the plates were cleared at Eisenberg's, she and Mr. Coe pulled out a dessert they had prepared at home: the prune dessert that President Roosevelt ate for lunch.
"It's called prune whip," Ms. Ziegelman said, adding that a common trick was to give modest recipes a snazzy name.
There was no whipped cream, just prunes, a little bit of flour, sugar, water and cinnamon.
Everyone reluctantly dipped a spoon into the viscous brown goo.
Surprisingly, it wasn't bad.
Mr. Coe went back for seconds, and thirds.
Sounding like a can-do budgeter, he told his wife, "Some chopped walnuts would help."
The report cannot prevent the market from doubting the credibility of OPEC. Oil recovery path is still bristled with thorns.
The monthly report of OPEC on Wednesday showed that the output of the entire OPEC organization in July, including Gabon, increased by 46,000 barrels/day to 33.11 million barrels/day.
Affected by this news, coupled with the production output expectations of rising crude oil and the unexpected increase in crude oil inventories, aggravating the excessive market supply.
It was April when the oil-producing countries had meeting. No agreement was reached among the OPEC member countries.
This means like a smoke and a mirror that draws people's attention (deliberately giving a false impression).
Eugen Weinberg, director of commodity research at the German commercial bank, said the possibility of OPEC trying to stabilize the market through the September meeting was low.
All localities should take medical institutions which have illegal medical advertising, complaints focusing on the past and have repeatedly been punished as a focus of inspection.
According to media disclosure, the large influx of capital into the Internet medicine has resulted in the serious problem of current product homogeneity. Investment boom fade gradually and capital came into the wait-and-see period.
According to the data of Hong Kong Ai Li Pi Hospital Management Research Center, a large number of start-up Internet medical companies languished just within one year and about 20% of the start-up Internet medical companies has ceased to exist.
However, just as the majority of Internet medical companies struggle in the road of A round or B round of financing, several sub-areas leading enterprises can still get the capital touted.
It seems that the Internet medical business shall not "swarm", but to see the needs of the market, and be professional and profound.
Yuyue invested 12 million yuan, accounting for 40% of the registered capital, while Jiuzhoutong invested 18 million yuan, accounting for 60% of the registered capital.
In recent years, with the country providing policy support in the medical information, electronic and integrated supply chain management system gradually enter the hospitals at all levels.
The cooperation between Yuyue and Jiuzhoutong is aimed at the needs of the market, helping the hospital to build advanced supply chain management system, and take this opportunity to seek more cooperation.
Unlike many Internet medical companies which go in for grandiose projects, iBaby focuses on the Internet obstetrics vertical field and be professional on pregnant mothers and doctors.
Pregnant women can not only enjoy 24 hours of medical services free of charge and one-on-one inquiry with doctors, but also pay for medical counseling.
At the doctor's side, iBaby breaks the geographical restrictions by taking the form of organizing experts to give grassroots doctors an online lecture, peer exchange, case discussion and so on.
The following services are provided, including online learning, case discussion and academic exchange; social platform for the exchange of doctors of the same hospital and department; legal assistance, business support and other services required by doctor-patient relationship or personal life.
According to media reports, CEO Wang Lei recently said Ali health "is willing to get down" to win big health data.
Internet companies and data companies are short of professionalism. No unity can be provided on the same entry.
Wang Lei admitted that it was more difficult for medical and health companies to start up than other industries, "This is not just how much money you have. In addition, it requires people to be concentrated on it and endure the loneliness.
Staying up late watching the Olympic Games will damage the heart easily
Brazil Olympic Games is in full swing. Even if the event is broadcast in the midnight in China, many people will stay up late to watch.
In this regard, the doctor reminded that staying up late has health risks and may lead to cardiovascular disease.
For old friends, Han Zhiyuan suggested them better not stay up late to watch games, particularly those with cardiovascular disease.
During the last "World Cup" football match, Han Zhiyuan received a 60-year-old patient. His onset of myocardial infarction may be related with staying up late to watch games.
According to Han Zhiyuan, his department had treated some 25-year-old myocardial infarction or stroke patients. This is largely due to long-term stay up of patients.
1. Do not stay up late every day. You can occasionally stay up all night watching the favorite sports and watch the rebroadcast for other sports next day.
2. You may drink more water, have more fruit during stay up as this can prevent blood clogging and enhance your body immunity.
Du Li became a consequent winner of the Olympic Games for 4 times. She won 2 gold, 1 silver and 1 bronze medals in these 4 Olympic Games.
In 1998, she became a member of Shandong Province shooting team and followed Coach Wang Dewen for professional shooting training.
In August, 2008, she scored a gold and broke the Olympic record for 690.3 rings in the 50-m sports rifle three positions.
In August, 2012, after serious failing in the London Olympic Games, Du Li announced the application for a temporary retirement to the International Stainless Steel Forum (ISSF).
The documentary "Polar" is a large-scale work that focuses on the world's third pole, Qinghai-Tibet Plateau. It tells a story for the integration of Tibetan tradition and the modern world and the interaction between Tibet and the world from a new perspective.
The production team of "Polar" Panorama VR special edition said that they will ensure that every aspect of the screen is impeccable and let the audiences have senses of immersive.
On August 11, the Armed Police Shandong Corps Yantai detachment organized special war snipers to have jungle training at Kunyu Mountain under the high temperature of 34 degrees Celsius.
The paper wrote that in the 1960s, in order to prevent the Soviet Union from suddenly launching nuclear war, the US Air Force has always had some fighters with nuclear warheads flying in the sky.
Later, he summarized the information provided by the US Air Force Air Meteorological Service and submitted a detailed report.
During daily travel, when citizens found that their cars were hampered by a strange vehicle, they may use "WeChat vehicle moving" function to solve this problem when they failed to contact with the strange vehicle driver.
From August 11, Xi'an traffic police WeChat service number "Xi'an traffic police" launched "WeChat vehicle moving" service.
After the launching of this service, during daily life, when the citizens found their cars were hampered by unfamiliar vehicles, the driver of which is not at the scene, they may solve the problems via "WeChat" function.
Citizens can operate it quite conveniently with their WeChat. Such method enables the both sides to meet in a friendly and easy way and alleviates and solves the problem of difficulty of parking and reduces the occurrence rate of car-related public security cases.
On the other hand, for those who refuse to move and have illegal parking or obstruction, Xi'an traffic control department said the traffic police will take different measures to handle the actual situation based on the actual situation.
On August 9, in the Dihua town cultural tourism scenic spots of Danfeng County, more than 10 young workers of Shangluo power supply company came here to carry out the "introduce electricity activity in the ancient town" and Double Seventh Festival theme activities.
Shangluo Power Supply Company Danfeng County Company combines with the construction of spiritual civilization, and actively organizes the "introduce electricity activity in the ancient town" and Double Seventh Festival theme activities.
Staff who participated in the activities said, "We spent most of our time on work and study, so we lack time and platform to chat with my colleagues and friends."
"This time the company has provided us with such a relaxed, happy and harmonious platform. I really like it, meaningful and interesting."
Nadal, a Spanish giant star and men's singles champion for Beijing Olympic Games, beat its opponent and advanced to the top eight in men's single and men's double is also qualified for the final.
Nadal, the grand slam gold winner, shows special preference to the Olympic Games. The unhealed Nadal struck and made a huge gain.
Covitova will compete with Pugue for a final coupon and another final seat will be produced between Keith and Kobel.
The semi-finals of the women's doubles are also produced in the semi-finals: Hingis/Basinsky vs. Hradeca/Heravacova; Makarova/Wisconsin vs. Stryker Kova/Safarova.
The final eight is also produced in the mixed doubles on the same day, but the defeat of the number one seed Ma Hu/Garcia combination and the withdrawal of Natto combination outshone the mixed doubles.
This is the day the US Defense Secretary Carter, US Secretary of State Kerry, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and Japan's Minister of Defense Gen Nakatani attended the press conference in New York.
The report is divided into nine chapters, including the overall policy adjustment, military strength, defense budget, military deployment, weapons and equipment, military system reform, military training, foreign military security cooperation and military security relations with China and so on.
The report said that the year 2015 is a phased last year of the Abe government to promote major policy adjustments in the security area.
The report emphasized that the Abe Cabinet tried to break through the above three points to achieve the promotion of Japan's "normal nationalization", and the going-out of militia to intervene in international security affairs, strengthen Japan-US alliance and prevent the rise of China and resist China.
According to the article, in contrast, the appearance of the American ambassador's residence, from the appearance of view, can be used as safety house in the cold war spy novels of John le Carré.
The residence is gray, and strongly fortified by peripheral fence, the second interior wall, barbed wire entanglement and vehicle roadblocks.
Dark coal field warehouse is turned into a "green grass" football field while red brick spire plant is turned into a modern sports museum.
On the national fitness day, Nanluo Maying Sports Culture Park, outside the Hangzhou Wangjiang gate, unveiled its mysterious veil.
After the renovation, it became a sports and cultural park, and will be officially opened in November to the public free of charge to provide sports venues. In addition, it would undoubtedly open up a new fertile soil for the whole people.
The level of competitive sports is closely related to the foundation of national sports. Athletic sports depend in a certain sense on national sports, and national sports depend on the conditions of the site.
In June this year, the State Council issued a "National Fitness Program (2016 - 2020)" and took the development of mass sports as a key content.
On the other hand, the already built public sports venues, including schools and other units in the sports venues, should try to expand the scope of openness and try to improve efficiency as much as possible.
Gilead to get attorney fees in hepatitis C patent fight with Merck
Gilead Sciences Inc is entitled to receive the attorney fees it incurred related to hepatitis C patent litigation with drugmaker Merck & Co Inc, a U.S. district judge has ruled.
In June, Gilead was freed from paying up $200 million in damages for infringing two Merck patents related to Gilead's blockbuster drugs Sovaldi and Harvoni, after a U.S. judge found a pattern of misconduct by Merck including lying under oath and other unethical practices.
In a filing on Thursday, U.S. District Judge Beth Labson Freeman said that Gilead was entitled to relief from the fees it incurred while defending the case.
Merck is trying to catch up to Gilead, which dominates the market on a new generation of hepatitis C drugs that can cure well over 90 percent of patients with the liver disease.
The case dates back to 2013 when Gilead and Merck sued each other, claiming ownership of laboratory work underlying sofosbuvir, the active ingredient in Gilead's drugs.
U.S. backed forces say they have seized full control of Manbij from Islamic State
In 2015, the Clintons made $1 million in charitable contributions, mostly to the Clinton Foundation; former President Bill Clinton brought in nearly $5.3 million in speaking fees; and the former secretary of state reported income of $3 million from publisher Simon & Schuster for her book on her tenure at the State Department.
In stark contrast, Donald Trump is hiding behind fake excuses and backtracking on his previous promises to release his tax returns.
It is customary for U.S. presidential candidates to make their tax returns public, although they are not required by law to do so.
Trump, a New York businessman, and his lawyers have cited an audit by the Internal Revenue Service as a reason for his refusal to release his returns.
"Your move," Clinton campaign aide Ian Sams said on Twitter, linking to the Democratic nominee's returns.
